So last week, poor Murphy was under the weather for a few days so I took him to the vet. The cost for that visit was a little over $450, proving that it's expensive to take car of a dog.
For promo copies, interview requests and all other press materials & inquiries:
Esther 4:13 Then Mordecai commanded to answer Esther, Think not with thyself that thou shalt escape in the king’s house, more than all the Jews.
And kamelado, which I made. I don't have a picture of it, but I'll post a recipe soon... it's delicious!!!
But before the three could get within twenty yards of the place in question, did their individual positions come under heavy fire–as remote combat drones saturated the skies overhead and began blasting merrily away.
What are little stones you step upon,
I emphasize the importance of self awareness and personal growth. If you seek out an astrologer, seek one who is willing to help you in achieving your goals or a better you. Don’t simply go get read, and walk away mystified; instead ask “HOW DO I?” “If I do X, then what?” Among other questions. A good astrologer, like a good psychic, should help with obstacles and how to surmount them.
Update: Last month I posted in support of my friend Donald Douglas who runs the American Power blog, who has, for years, been under relentless attack by hateful leftists who have even gone so far as to try to get him fired from his job - simply because they disagree with his political opinions. Donald has a new post up today describing the fact that the blog dedicated in its entirety to attacking him, could not even leave him alone on Thanksgiving Day. The comments section there includes some snide remarks about his marriage. How very sad that some people apparently have nothing better to do, on a day dedicated to reflecting on all of the things for which one should be thankful, than to pick at a man over every single thing he ever writes on his blog, and then bitch about it when that man discusses the relentless attacks. But then again, Thanksgiving is an American holiday, and gratitude is something expressed by people who actually have functioning souls, so I suppose this should not be surprising. (Yes, this update did previously say something else, but after being asked to do further investigation, I did and have amended this post, as promised.)
For further information about VAST please visit our website at www.vast.org.uk
I *Love* this bracelet and I know you will too. Made me beautiful purple quartz beads, accented with a beautiful “LOVE” spacers, this bracelet will surely communicate that you love-love! This bracelet is size customizable!
(It is important to remember that in NHS statistical terminology “elective caesarean section” includes planned caesarean sections carried out for medical reasons – i.e. not simply at the patient’s option. I suggest, however, it is reasonable to assume that those who require caesarean sections for medical reasons are by and large already receiving them. Moreover, I suggest that the 10% elective rate already includes a proportion of patients who have chosen to have a caesarean section for non-medical reasons, but that we must recognise that such choice currently requires the support of the obstetrician.)
CV: Well, it's all I know. I don't really know what it would be to do someone else's family, or some other such story. I have photographed some special people on assignment for magazines, for example I did a Newsweek cover story on men with Chronic Depression. That's just a few hours with a person.
records." Only later, in transciption, do I realise how expertly she
BOG goes to Eddy, Anthony Edwards with some 18+ years of elite competition with his first World Championship Gold. His reaction when greeted by John Coates in the waiting area before the medal ceremony is epic. Huge effort by Eddy with all the crew. Plus all the Australian rowers seemed to be smiling and enjoying themselves greatly. Thats how it should be. Here's to remembering and now moving onto new peaks coming in the season ahead.
I recently saw two videos reproduced here and they provoked the thought stated above in the title of this post.
Gingrich’s lead with evangelicals held steady today at 40-22 over Romney. He’s also doing well with Tea Party voters (46-21), registered Republicans (38-30), voters describing themselves as very conservative (41-21), men (39-27), and voters in the Upstate (36-25).
I'm a Free Spirit! I betcha already knew that, but I am really enjoying getting to know the Shannon Kinney-Duh and her work. Her challenge for February is this (so simple) Laugh MORE, Play MORE, Love MORE...
Travelling around and in both the italian people in italy a cell phone becomes your property and your US phone in Italy. Italian networks work on 900 MHz and 1900 MHz. The tri-band phone is compatible to the italian people in italy that you want to chose a coastal Italy honeymoon in these cities during Italy tours, you will need accommodation in all the info you could possibly need during your vacation in Italy. This included commercial, residential and speculative investment purchases by foreign nationals.
The MWA Agents and Editor’s Cocktail Party is one of the many events making up the Edgar Awards festivities in New York City each April, and this year I got to go. I could lie and be all blasé about it, but it was pretty much as fascinating as it sounds – a room full of writers, editors, agents, and publishers at every level of experience and success sipping wine and sampling an impressive variety of bite-sized hors d’oeuvres carried by wait staff who were a great deal better dressed than I. I’m pretty sure I sampled them all – the hors d’oeuvres that is, not the wait staff. (Anything that fits in your mouth without the need to unhinge your jaw is too small to be counted as calories, right?)
1. A chiropractic or surgical device, possibly used for spinal injuries or setting leg breaks.
But why my body went numb and cold when you tasted my lips,
"Head to Toe" is broken into two parts in The French Laundry Cookbook -- Braised Stuffed Pig's Head with Sauce Gribiche, and Pig's Feet with French Green Lentils. We're gonna start with the feet, and get to the head in a later post. Wow. I can't wait to see what freak-ass Google search lands someone on this page based on that last sentence. Yipes.
We start in the UK, where every effort is made to portray Khalid as an ordinary boy, with ordinary friends, who likes to play not-so-ordinary video games. Very elaborate misunderstandings with certain governments ensue, and already the reader is a little dazed by the backstory Perera throws at them. There are endless prison transfers and endless other prisoners and endless prison guards, portrayed always, always in black and white instead of the shades of gray that always dominate shady politics. Khalid is obsessed with the beautiful girl he left back home; she pulls him through. There is a drawn-out ending that beats the reader with its lofty messages until we feel black and blue.
With Kathi’s book in hand, there’s no more need to hit the panic button.
VOILA! Three upcycled cheapie frames, worthy of my wee grandkidlets, who're spending the whole summer with me here in Nova Scotia...I am one LUCKY Grammie...and life is... so very GOOD!! They even like to help me PAINT!
I bring this up because at one point Tuesday these things came together right in front of me. Before bed on Tuesday night we were watching a DVD series called “Buck Denver asks, “What’s in the Bible?” If you remember the other day I wrote about the relevance of the Bible in 2012, so this relates to that. The Bible is still relevant, in fact it is the most relevant book out there. These videos teach the Bible in a very fun, creative and exciting way to kids. My kids were learning about the Pentateuch and what it means to live with a Holy God. Some of their innocence came out again as they said that they won’t disobey God. My 5-year-old said that he would never do those things to God. I know that seems prideful, but he really doesn’t want to disobey God. He does disobey, believe me, but my point is that simple faith is such a refreshing part of parenting.
our little part of the forest is burned, burned, burned.
I tried to get a picture of him on the first day, but he was running around so much, I couldn't get a good shot:) He has to wear tennis shoes instead of his usual Crocks, so it makes him look like such a little boy!
Origen
It looks like it is going to be a black Christmas. I am not referring to global warming, even though that is evident too.
Now, my gosh! My eyes, my heart is humbled every single day. The light is so bright, even the occasional worry is instantly freed thru a reading. You, each and every one of you, are so beautifully magnificent. I truly live in a state of privilege and blessing each and every day, because YOU show up and bless me by your presence of Light. I evolve because you evolve! I seek further understanding because you seek further understanding. Thank you so much for pushing us all to our outer edges of understanding and evolution every day!
We had some lovely weather on the weekend, and I really didn't want to spend too much time on the internet over the last couple of days. Added to that, I am still mesmerized with my new little "palm reader", the iPod, though I have to say, it has let me down a few times when it comes to trying to comment or blog. The other day, I wrote a poem in the editor and was quite pleased with it— even though it took me twice as long to create—but then, with the slip of a pinky, I deleted it!!! Fortunately, I remembered the gist and was able to reconstruct it when I got on my desktop pc. Phew!
Re CAMHS referral fiasco: D’s GP phoned virtually as soon as I was out of D’s school. She hadn’t received the fax sent on Monday (!) and has asked that I take a copy to the surgery on Monday! We had a brief conversation and I think she took on board the fact that three months have been wasted and that D’s anxieties and meltdowns are NOT caused by shyness as the silly missing letter suggests. We’ll talk again once she’s had the letter.
January Dawn Happening after Kevin Goodan
One of the problems I thought I'd bring up here is that occasionally, writers try to sound smart even when they're actually nincompoops. In this case, I throw out some medical lingo: the creatures want to eat brains because of damage to the parietal lobe! Aha! Unfortunately, damage to the parietal lobe might mess with your language and motor skills, but it's not going to turn you into a cannibal and wipe away your sense of morality. That's not something that only experts know - it's something that the general, nonmedical populace (i.e. me) knows. It's something you can Google, for goodness' sake! With so much information readily available on the web, you shouldn't be writing about how George Washington led the Confederates during the Civil War or how a mixture of Kool Aid and mouthwash can corrode steel.
It feels like all our plans have been turned upside-down (The World reversed) today. We were trying to set goals and work toward them, but it looks like the chess game got swept off the table and we have to set it up again. Or, to use a modern metaphor, our GPS didn’t take into account traffic, so we have turned a different way and are now waiting while the GPS system reroutes.
The third requirement is a really interesting one. It suggests that normal relationship counselling will not work. You need to see someone who understands Aspergers Syndrome.
05. Swingin' A-Go-Go
Sweet, piping hot, black roasted coffee tastes great when served with blueberry muffins or salty bacon and eggs at 7 in the morning, but it also works as a great night cap after a long day at work. When mixed with cream, ice and flavourful syrup, coffee also becomes a great treat for those of us who had a bad day or as a reason to simply catch up with our friends.
I'm alive and healthy.
Each of us in the autism community – self-advocates, parent advocates, friends and family, teachers, health professionals – we would all have different messages for IWishIDidn’t HaveAspergers. But likely a common thread would be that we would all try to send the message that there is a brighter future and that friendship and support are out there.
Let your beauty be everlasting
or manually created swap devices.
Synopsis (from Goodreads): Kate Winters has won immortality. But if she wants a life with Henry in the Underworld, she’ll have to fight for it…
Didn't her husband say something about once having been to a folk festival? "Hmmm," she pondered. "I don't think Robert would go to a folk festival, though he's taken our younger son to Reading." And what about morris dancing? "It's good fun for a while but I find it gets boring: there's only so many times you can watch men banging sticks on the ground before it pales.
This summer I plan to head out on the long road.
Prodigy Out of space UK
Since I've been blogging, I now visit the library about once every week and half. I frequent the library a lot more during the summer because I want to keep my kiddos reading. I'm cheap, so I rarely buy books. When I do, they tend to be more reference "how to" types that I typically purchase used or on clearance.
Anyway, the main purpose of this post is to tell you about some fabulous blog candy that Hels Sheridan is offering over on her blog to celebrate passing 800 followers. I don't often advertise blog candy but Hels' blog is one of my favourites because as well as being one talented lady she's also very funny and reading her posts always brightens my day. Do drop by and see what you have to do to be in with a chance of winning this lovely booty. Just click on the pic in my sidebar to be transported to her lovely blog.
How to Catch a Rabbit is a new play about a group of urban Gypsies living in south-east London. We join Stan, Nell, Cass and Sonya as Eric returns to the council-run site. Through their eyes we experience the suffocating encroachment of the state. With live music composed by Shou Jie Eng, you are pulled into the dark and desperate world of Nettlebeck. An exciting and brave confrontation between generations, between cultures, between dogs and their prey. You are the gawja … can you catch a rabbit? Inspired by one of the LSE‘s founders, George Bernard Shaw, The Revolving Shed draws its name from the revolving hut at the end of the garden in which Shaw penned some of his most famous dramatic works. Entirely student-produced and committed to original work, the company is dedicated to exploring the social sciences through theatre.
know what you are good at? Even if you think you know what you’re
Here are what I can look at now :
He has been doing gymnastics since he was 5 years old. The only one of my kids who was a climber, (the other kids would climb on the monkey bars, Trevor would always be the kid on top of the monkey bars) I figured that if he was going to climb then he was going to have to learn how to fall. I enrolled him in a gymnastics class and within a few weeks, he was put on the boys’ team.
And other stories . . .
Quinn
He's a thinker and an inward processor.
42 doesn’t seem so old anymore, though.
Despite the 2009 CARD Act President Obama signed into law that should have put into place guidelines for credit card companies’ efforts of marketing to college students, most are also graduating with an average of $3,000 in credit card debt – along with their average $29,000 in student loans each student leaves his dorm room with.
I have taught special education for 10 years now, so I have had a lot of exposure to young children with special needs. You'd think I would be a pro at having one of my own, but I am definitely not. I can't believe how much responsibility and stress comes with raising a child with disabilities. Thankfully, we are blessed with a very supportive family and educational team who work with Ella and help us through the tough times.
I don’t have money for a Super PAC
So far in the history of BGT and X-Factor, for that matter, no one has ever won who has not been an "invited or preferred" contestant, and it does sadden me that, all those thousands of people, lining up outside, often in the rain and cold, are basically wasting their time. The producers of BGT are not looking for the talented people, they aready have those. The reality is that the producers are hunting out oddities, freaks and, I'm ashamed to say, mentally ill people, to act as amusing fillers in the audition shows. They are nothing more than unpaid extras and they don't even qualify for traveling expenses!
“Students should know that if they’re interested in research, then approach your professors about it because there’s a strong chance they’ll get to work with them on a project,” Bell said.
Did you expect a more dramatic season ender? Will Kalinda really kill her never-seen hubbie? Will Alicia make up with Peter to have the family back together again? And what about Will, whom she tells she has no regrets about their affair? Give us your TwoCents…
Me: Yes, what did you think it was?
She had forgotten how splendid the great waterway looked on a clear, hot summer evening, and how the sense of floating between marble palaces and reflected lights disposed the mind to sympathetic talk.
A river gauge near the Ouachita National Forest registered a rise of about 2.4m (8ft) in just one hour, the US Geological Survey said.
5. In My Life — No one — no one! — has better expressed the emotions you go through looking back on your life than John did in this song. Oh, people have told more detailed stories, painted more clear pictures with words. But this song is straight to the gut.
but it never ceases.
I enjoyed the mystery of how the different pieces of the story fit together. It was interesting to read the historical details of the Titantic sinking and how the bodies were retrieved. Although the ghost and ending of the story seemed a bit contrived, I liked the way Kevin tried to figure out the mystery of how the house and ghost were connected to him. There were some spooky moments with the ghost to keep up the suspense!
According to Kodava text, the 2500 year-old civilization of the Kodavas has evolved from a synthesis of people that originally lived in the region of today’sOman &Yemen, and had migrated around the fifth century BC.
What changes us is the Holy Spirit Grammar of God. What changes us is prayer to Him.
PCC: “Is it possible to keep running on the treadmill even though you’re pretty sure you died 9 minutes ago?”
See my video tutorial below.
Main Idea: A celebration of the intimate physical relationship God intended for marriage.
Less ambiguous is Halle Sellassie (2004), a parody of Ingres’ portrait Emperor Napoleon 1 on his Imperial Throne. Some know Sellassie as the departed ruler of Ethiopia, but in the world of Davis and Langlois, the image exudes hemp paraphernalia, conjuring the mystique of Bob Marley and the Wailers. The “Lion of Judah” becomes a soft, fussy rich kid. Sellassie carries his girth like a pillow and his legs do not appear to have any real connection to his body; they hang limp in front of the throne.
I will illustrate with the most frustrating of topics : log laws. I can't think of a topic that seems more boring and pointless to most math teachers and students. I know their virtues as well as you, but let's be honest, 99% of your kids don't really need to know them for anything they are likely to do for the rest of their lives. I posted about it last year, but there was a piece missing, and now it really sings. To believe this works, you have to believe that the one doing the work is the one learning. Nobody gets much out of Miss Nowak doing dramatic performances of math problems and proofs other than Miss Nowak learning how to do dramatic performances of math problems and proofs under the withering attention of 24 bored and irritated teenagers. I don't want to give the impression that I'm giving them a worksheet and being all like, "You're on your own, kids! Time for me to kick back and drink coffee." Because I'm running around, scanning for common questions or points of confusion or missed connections, re-capping with the whole group every five to ten minutes, encouraging and validating, etc. But if you believe "teaching" = "lecturing" then you are not going to see the validity of this approach, and I can't help you.
Once of our lessons was on synonyms. I love teaching synonyms because it really helps build my class' vocabulary. I am so sick of them writing, "It was so fun. I am so happy..." I know they are capable of being amazing writers, so I was really delighted to sweeten up their language! Found on the amazing Pinterest, here are Synonym Rolls!
I'd desperately like to believe that human consciousness isn't some sort of genetic fluke. That our ability to create music, to create art, to create language, to create love and selflessness, isn't just the product of synapses in our brain that override the animalian urges to procreate, feed, and resist death.
"This is not hard, mouth-breather. You either did or did not have your sunglasses when we were rock climbing."
Standing at the altar or at the chair and facing the people, with hands joined, the priest says:
Further Redutctions - Gato Negro
“Summer, 1545.
Thanks to Holly for helping out on the KMKM tour. Phew, it's all feeling a little hectic. And there's still Melissa, Joy, Keirsten and Ally to come. If you've missed any, then click on the button somewhere on the right on this page. No, up a bit. Yes, there.
Seaweed (sushi type), 1 piece
The sight of thee calls back the robin's song,
8. Reprieve
The stones are evenly spaced, row after row, life after life. Setting sun pours a final goodbye over the land.
Right and Wrong
Mothers and Fathers.
Now in order to figure out how many stripes you can do on you wall you need to figure out how long your walls are.
Shedding light on our human tendency to appreciate the gifts instead of the Giver, Piper reminds us that the greatest gift is God himself. He spotlights how several prominent Gospel gifts point past themselves to glorify the Giver. All are given so we can joy in God, even sufferings and death. Furthermore, gratitude and prayer can become idolatrous if they are not seen in the correct light of reflecting glory back to God. He concludes his book on our brilliant hope of eternal glory by posing the question—do we rejoice in the promise of our glorious end or being in the eternal presence of Christ? Piper summarizes that we are made like the glorified Christ so he will be the exalted firstborn. Only made like him can we see him and behold him more truly as he is, deeply delighting and displaying his glory.
Grandmasters Final (45-54)
Jackie (using Halloween Skelekinz-pumpkin 2)
Sale q.b.
We coated some of them in chopped nuts, some in icing sugar and drizzled melted white chocolate over some of the others.
A 22-year-old is back in the High Court today in a bid to stop six national newspapers from naming him over a video he claims defames him.
Not all homes come with storage for vehicles and other associated items. However, building a garage can be quite costly and really involve a lot of heavy duty construction.
Headlining the festival on Saturday, May 5, is BeauSoleil avec Michael Doucet, a band that has received 11 Grammy nominations during its 30+ year career. In 2009, the band won a Grammy for Best Zydeco or Cajun Music Album for Live at the New Orleans Jazz & Heritage Festival.
This history also reminds us that many Americans were loathe to enter World War II at all. By October 1941, Japan had been occupying parts of China for ten years, and the Rape of Nanking was four years old. The Battle of the Atlantic was in full swing, and the Battle of Britain was a year in the past, after a year of almost-nightly bombardment of England by Germany. Despite these assaults on friends and allies of the U.S., and the losses of U.S. ships and merchant marines, the U.S. had remained officially neutral.
These kinds of machines which promise ultimate power at low, low prices are still a recurrent phenomenon, and make for pretty big business. Perhaps it’s not surprising that people regularly claim to have invented or discovered some device, mechanism, or physical process which would render that whole fossil fuel problem moot. It’s an appealing notion, to have something which could power itself and let you siphon off the overflow, storing and using all this new energy as it spills out from… somewhere. Unfortunately – at least, if you’re living under Homer Simpson’s roof and obey the laws of thermodynamics – the Universe places an inconvenient embargo on the whole idea.
Give me palmie for my throat also.
June xxx
Tori Wester is studying Political Science at Kennesaw State University. At 21 years of age, she has served as both Financial Secretary of the Georgia Association of College Republicans and Chairman of KSU College Republicans. Tori is currently working to reinstate the Cherokee County Young Republicans.
Enhance the rainbow hovering over ones head...
The Next one is named The Bone House and is suppose to come out in September 2011.
Stand back. Yes, this is it, the place where the magic happens. If, by magic, you mean a staggering number of hours spent playing inane online games like Bejeweled Blitz (don’t make me explain please), additional hours manipulating spreadsheets because then I can feel as if I’ve accomplished something or time surfing the net and tweeting (Satan’s playground).
Slappy paused for a moment and cleared, dramatically, his phlegm.
It would be hard for the average person to understand why the vague ramblings of the world's foremost energy cornucopian, the sweet, smiling, even-tempered Daniel Yergin, could stir up so much antipathy. The typical inhabitant of planet Earth has never even heard of this man and remains blissfully unaware of the dangers of fossil fuel depletion--dangers that Yergin naturally dismisses in his recent piece in The Wall Street Journal.
Tuesday, 15 May at Great Lines Heritage Park, Gillingham
We hear there is no longer a military presence at the crossroads. But this fails to reassure us and if anything makes us even more nervy. Presumably all efforts are now going into repelling an invasion rather than subduing the populace.
Papi decided he needed a new BBQ.
I include the prayer entitled Environment written by Ian Black
4 anything
Of course this all depends on what format my library has a specific book available in. From comparing what I bought in the last few months to what is available there are 4 books I purchased that could have been just borrowed. Plus there are a few I was not really sure if I wanted to read or not (Girl With the Dragon Tattoo) that now I can borrow happily.
Cropping and straightening is also cleverly implemented. You can pinch and zoom within a set crop frame, or resize the frame with or without preserving aspect ratio. But neatest of all is the ability to level by holding the iPad at an angle after tapping on the compass-like control below the photo. This takes advantage of the device’s accelerometer. You can also just twist two fingers on the photo.
4. Faith still pleases God.
Does is work? Research using “pause” procedure to enhance lecture recall found that with the pause students could recall 108 correct facts vs. 80 without the pause. Less can be more. Another study shows that active learning is twice as effective as lecturing. See Hake 1988 article in American Journal of Physics which shows students learn twice as much when instructors used active learning techniques. Often variation in student questioning can help students learn. For instance, instead of picking one students to respond, ask all to reflect for 60 seconds. When working with teams, Prince gave us a scenario to reflect upon the problems with a team-based assignment. Collaborative learning (CL) using structure to improve teamwork. Regular self-assessment, positive interdependence with individual accountability. Give students complex activities where they need each other to complete the learning activities. Springer, et al (1999) Effects of Small Group Learning paper showed CL works.
The following day I had to go back to my family doctor becuase the pain had not subsided. He diagnosed me in two seconds after taking a simple urine test. I had a urinary tract infection.
3. place bowl over pot (but don't let it touch the water!) and whisk until the mixture temperature reaches 160F, this will ensure all bacteria have been killed off. Using a hand mixer, beat over the simmering water until you get a nice and fluffy frosting, voila! finished!
It's always fun to wander around exhibits like this because they usually offer fun little toys. This exhibition was no exception, except the quality of the toys and gadgets was much higher. But, they do have money to spend.
Friday - Pastie pie from the freezer or homemade Chicken schnitzel and potato salad
Gaumont embraces Devil's Kiss
Anyway. I like what Eileen Myles writes about being an artist and working-class, as I'm working-class too, culturally definitely, there's a distinction now in our post-Palin world, my father was a lawyer, but we lived in a working-class suburb and I was the kid who didn't know what a Banana Republic was in high school and wore my sister's hand-me-downs from Kohl's and Carson's and was taunted for my wardrobe, and I never really understood until recently the class dynamics of cruelty in high school where I was definitely the lower rung, the school librarian gave us a ride to school every day because we never had a car. But definitely working-class culturally, in that my extended family is working-class, check-out clerks at grocery stores, bus drivers, people that work with their hands, and my family shops at Aldi and buys generic and is horrified of my penchant for vegan foods, natural foods. Horrified by me. Who has no idea how to make money, has never prioritized making money, and hates the idea of art and money, together, I think it ruins it, I want to have a press someday and give the books away for free, that's my great dream.
D: “Mumma, please change the TV to my favourite channel”
J.W. Lees & Co (Brewers) Ltd J.W. Lees Vintage Harvest Ale
OF WIM VAN HOOSTE (Anno 2006)
And so, recently, I have been attempting to rebuild some of these friendships. It is a slow process - building takes longer than destroying always. I still hate using the phone. I still find it easier to interact virtually than to deal with real people but I have started to reach out to friends I haven't seen for 3 years, to ask them, "What's been happening in your life?" and to listen - to really listen (without the gentle background hiss of my inner demons who chant "Not as bad as baby death, not as bad as baby death").
So, Pippa called me and said she was tired of me always featuring Kate in my blog and never her. I decided she was right, so it’s her turn in today’s post! (Wink, wink!)
The spring rolls were big, nice, and freshly rolled, however the dipping sauce seemed a little wrong, it was dense, a weird cloudy brown and it needed more lime.
I have some very cool surprises :)
I wrote a little about rhythm in horror a while ago, which is a big one, and Hart Johnson made a great observation in the comments about The Shining and "red rum." It reminded me of another great storytelling tool: repetition. One of my creepiest childhood horror stories was about a young girl lying in bed while a disembodied voice comes closer and closer. "Mary, I am coming up the stairs. Mary, I am on the first step. Mary, I am on the second step." Good, creepy repetition works the best when the repeated line ramps up the tension.
Attic Dog by David Raffin
* JIPLP -- which, in keeping with its publisher's charitable objectives, has been made available to educational institutions in many developing countries -- receives a sizeable number of articles submitted from such jurisdictions;
In the beginning, life was harsh as they had nothing, no electricity or even food. They had to eat grass and roots they found in the mountain, and Liu made a kerosene lamp that they used to light up their lives.
08: Aerosol – Being Around (04:18)
2:00pm – 3:00pm
Anyhoo, since I don't have any new pics to show you, I thought I'd share an older one of me in greenery, like Lola...except I don't have a fancy chair:
Let’s do some math. Let’s pretend you have a “B” player who has a potential for growth of 50% and is selling $1mm of your stuff. This salesperson sells at a 30% margin. Also on your team is a “D” player who has a growth potential of 200% but is only selling $250K of your stuff. This salesperson sells at a 20% margin.
In all my years here, I've noticed that Italians are Olympic gold medalists at complaining (loudly, rowdily, individually, or in groups) but rarely do they actually voice their beef with someone in charge or even take the simple steps necessary to resolve the situation. WHY IS THAT? Is there some cultural hang-up about being proactive or confrontational? Is it considered inappropriate to speak up? I've noticed this in old & young alike, even some of my friends have this tendency. It seems ridiculous to me, why bother using so much energy to complain instead of simply using that same energy to fix what's wrong? I'm not saying people have to be aggressive and demanding, I'm just saying that 90% of the time, situations like the one I just mentioned could be easily resolved by speaking up. It blows my mind to be surrounded by a nation of people who will stew in their indignation, will get worked up about it, but are too passive to speak up or stand up to make a real change.
The results are in, folks. The NFL Draft is OVER. I’m part thankful because I don’t have to listen to Mel Kiper blab about his “profession” anymore, but I’m also bummed. While I love baseball, this means no football until August at the earliest.
Just as I was wrapping up my Coke shots a Capitol Hill police officer rolls up on a motorcycle. Right away, ‘Hey there. Do you mind if I ask you a few questions?’ In my head I had prepared myself for this very scenario. On the series of tubes I had read story after story of photographers being harassed by police and security guard types. In my head I am prepared to reply to his questions about what I am doing and why I am taking pictures armed with a copy the photographers right in my bag. Before I could muster up the courage to resist, Officer Motor Bike is backed up with no less than nine (9) additional officers. Six more in uniform and three plain clothes officers. WTF just happened?!?
Warm weather is just around the corner….
I find myself laying (lying??) awake at night, obsessing about so many different things. My heart is heavy at the thought that Kayla's childhood is gone. At 19 it was anyway, but this makes everything so final. It feels too soon, too fast, too much. Not the baby itself, but the way in which time passes.
Email entries are welcome. Email using the Contact Button and they'll be popped into the post for you. It's lovely to see that almost everybody has that dratted word verification off now. It really does make life easier for all design team members. Thank you. Please link directly to your post and not just your blog. Thanks.
The winner of the challenge will receive one of our very popular mini kits which can be found instore here, we do currently have a couple of spaces left for a subscription but be quick as they do go quickly.
I didn't put up a tree this year. For the last couple of years, the cats (the boys, I think) have confused the tree skirt for a litter box and I just couldn't deal with it this year.
So, if you feel ‘out of sorts’ then perhaps you could try the above too!
He says: “A lot of people are sensitive to dairy and eating dairy can inflame other complaints people have and cause issues for people with digestive problems. I have always been a big fan of coconut and a huge food lover, so I thought I would try to exploit a gap in the market.
and wild voices splitting the air.
By now I should be well on my way to Cozumel.
Why then the No vote? One major pointer was that much of the electorate felt ill informed about what Lisbon would mean, and were frustrated by the size, complexity and basic unreadability of the treaty document .The No Lobby attacked this opaqueness effectively, with their most articulate spokesman calling for a constitution like that of the USA as he theatrically binned the Lisbon Treaty document. There were also complaints that Ireland would lose out in terms of influence under the new voting arrangements in the EU’s governing body – the Council (true, but how could Ireland expect to hold its share when other countries were also making compromises to absorb more equitably the new members?).
It was a great chance to spend some quality dude only time. Its crazy how the removal of just one can make everything so much easier. Well, maybe that’s b/c we’re talking about the removal of the teenage girl stuck in the body of a 4.5yr old, but still…
The lettering is an alpha stamp which completed the page.
"The French (read: Godly) mother is often the source of everything that informs the French (Godly) girl: a sense of the feminine, of social conduct, poise, etiquette and, of course, cooking. She's an arbiter of continuity and tradition, a sort of magistrate who oversees the smooth functioning of family life--managing conflict, diffusing resentments, letting go of grudges in an elegant and seemingly transparent way. Through her all things eventually pass--the family's history as living memory as well as the future."
One of the cool giveaways came right in the door, with Warner Bros. giving out giant tote bags to every attendee. The bags spotlighted a number of WB properties, among them TV series like Human Target, Chuck, Fringe, Nikita, Supernatural, Vampire Diaries and Big Bang Theory. The only way to get one of these so far is to pick one up on eBay, but they’re worth it. Not only do they look impressive, but they hold a ton of stuff. (And yes, I have the Human Target bag. You expected anything else?)
We are not having a very sunny spring this year over at the UK so this theme is brilliant to remind us all the new beginning that happen in the spring time :)
Stockpile, Stockpiling: This occurs when you use your extreme couponing skills to build a supply of food and non-food items. The key to buiding your stockpile (an act called stockpiling) is to buy multiples of items when they are at rock-bottom prices. That way, when you run out of something, you don’t have to go to the store and pay full price for another. You just shop your stockpile. This saves you tons of time and money!
Third, salvation can indeed be lost. When we accept God’s invitation through belief and baptism, we are justified (receive Sanctifying Grace) and have begun the process of salvation through an ongoing conversion. It is possible to reject this freely offered gift of salvation from God through future sin. If we lose this grace, we once again accept his call through sacramental confession. The notion of “once save, always saved” is not only not found in scripture, we are warned against believing in such a thing.
I realized this:
Deborah Riley-Magus’ Creating an Effective Business Plan
I took a C6 White Linen Card Blank and embossed the diagonal lines using a scoreboard. The panel has been inked with two shades of yellow ink and stamped using a Lili of the Valley Grunge background stamp and a couple of Hero Arts stamps. The panel has been matted and layered onto a scrap of yellow card and added to the card blank with foam pads. The sentiments are from a Personal Impressions set and are stamped in Brilliance Graphite Black Ink. Finally a few pearls to finish.
EXCESSIVE ENERGY: You go early to bed, exhausted, but in a couple of hours you are wide. This is caused by the Photon Belt energy accumulating around you, because the body’s inability to store the energy because it is blocked and congested. It is important not to get up and be active because the energy is for healing all the subtle bodies spiritual, mental, emotional and physical, the best way to assimilate the energy is to quietly sit and read, watch TV, or listen to meditation tapes to help you go back to sleep. This might seem to occur nightly for some time.
But, with starting to raise chickens, planting a vegetable garden and starting a fruit orchard, there was not much time (or energy, I am sure) to worry about decorating the kids' rooms.
Ask a farmer with a great deal of experience, and he will tell you that goats are never happy with what they have. They are always sticking their head through the fence. They
Yes, it was THE big surprise last week.
Underscoring her desire to program first rate jazz – ranging from big bands and straight ahead jazz to funk and TK – the opening night headliner was the Bob Sheppard’s stellar quintet, with the leader on soprano and tenor saxophones, John Beasley on piano and keyboards, Tim Lefebvre on bass and Steve Hass on drums.
I’m a little peeved at:
Cover & Title: I love the title. It feels old-fashioned and suits the mood of the book. It’s also in a line of dialogue spoken by a character in the book. The keyhole design on the cover really grabs the eye.
A few statistics tell the real story. Since his inauguration in 2009, the average retail price of a gallon of gas has gone from $1.83 to $3.44, an increase of 84%! That’s what happens when the government virtually shuts down all exploration and extraction of oil on federal land.
“It is not kind to speak ill of the dead, and that in deed is not our intention. We cannot help thinking, however, that if the deceased had not scattered his energies in so many different directions he would have attained a greater degree of success. In any walk of life he would have won distinction, but when he consented to lend himself to several lines of effort at the same time, he taxed his efforts to too great an extent. His loss, however, for this reason will not be less deplored. His career was full of usefulness and was one moreover that cannot be easily duplicated.”
hot glue gun for lid
Zeigler has headed the Community Affairs Bureau since January 2006. His wife, Neldra Zeigler, is the NYPD's deputy commissioner for equal employment opportunity.
For a burgeoning love story, Tom and Allison certainly had their moments. It might have been Tom’s new internet fame that got them talking in the first place but at the end of the episode, I think Tom and Allison learned more about themselves and each other than they thought. That’s a good thing, considering they still managed to be unaware of who actually leaked the footage of Tom and George online.
Back in the here and now, the new exhibition is being produced by Bristol University's Penguin Archive Project and curated by Katherine Hann, who previously created the permanent collection at the award-winning Empire and Commonwealth Museum. Since Penguin Books was founded in 1935 by a Bristolian, publisher Allen Lane, it is fitting that the vast Penguin Archive should be housed at the University, and that the RWA should be hosting this unique exhibition.
N: Well, it’s the classic problem; we have pledges but I have no idea whether the animals were telling the truth. We’re particularly strong in the eastern section of the ward where the monkey vote looks firmly in your camp. However, you know the monkey’s; young, free-spirited and not particularly interested in politics. As always, we’re really concerned that they won’t turnout. However, we’ve got some really enthusiastic young female monkeys on staff and they’ve pledged to spend the whole day in the trees persuading them to come to the polls.
brownies (homemade)
The purpose of public education is not to provide a “future work force” it is to create an enlightened society of mature, intelligent, creative, critically thinking individuals who are empathetic and civic minded.
I’m going to write about my life, share truth that will hopefully help others going through the same thing.
My birds birthdays always remind me of how happy and fortunate I am to have these Golden Girls in my life. I reflect back on all the silly sh*t we have done over the years, how many tears we’ve shed together, how often we laugh out loud and the things we do to help each other, it’s pretty amazing.
Nothing’s that simple though. Just like bones, personalities can get broken, shattered even, and, seriously, who wants to read about a healthy, well-rounded individual going about their day-to-day business? I suppose there must be people like that out there just as a non-dysfunctional family might also exist somewhere but I’m not holding my breath. Life damages us. If we’re jammy we get away with a few cuts and bruises but most of us aren’t so lucky and we will sustain any number of more serious injuries over the years which is why some of us end up with personality disorders. We all know the popular ones, the obsessive-compulsives, the schizophrenics, but there are others and, of course, how these conditions manifest themselves vary. You often hear people say, “Oh, I’m just being a little bit OCD,” or something along those lines. Can you just be a little bit OCD? Yes, you can. People don’t fit into boxes neatly. They can have mood disorders too like depression or bipolar disorder too. They’ll have varying IQs. They have unique life experiences. Basically there as many boxes out there as there are people.
Home based education, home education, independent learning, home learning, self-directed learning, life learning, organic learning, natural learning, autodidactism, worldschooling, child-led learning, student-led learning, delight driven learning.
To be outside at 7am today, soaking up the sun, nodding hello to passersby.
This one is Haley and Harley isn't it so cute!!!
“Here. Try it on, my love,” Hannah said reverently. Purry Paw, realizing that he was no longer the center of attention, pounced onto the padded seat in the attic’s gable window. The cat proceeded to gaze at the moon, yawn, and lick his paws. Panther reached tentatively for the protective raiment and swept its warm folds across her back. The attached velvet hood was lined with pale green satin that matched the color of Glowgold’s jade wand.
There is a large part of me that feels like perhaps it’s because we live in a society where divorce is an easy choice and divorce attorney’s are posting billboards that say, “Life is short. Get a divorce.” and websites like “Ashley Madison” are promoting extra marital affairs and swingers clubs are growing in popularity. I suppose I could see how wearing a wedding ring would be an inconvenience to those life choices but fortunately there are still good men out there like my husband who wear their wedding rings because they are proud to be married, proud of their wife, proud of their commitment and who aren’t looking to play around on the side. Lord knows my husband would have no problem picking up another woman if he wanted to but I love knowing that he doesn’t want to and would never betray me like that.
that hopefully explains something...or maybe it will just leave you confused.
Another mystery, perhaps solved, perhaps not. If you can shed any light on Cassandra's other life in Italy, please share what you know with the class. In the meantime, I'll keep coming up with interesting bits of musical history for you, all of which can be heard in the massive archive of MusicMaster Oldies.
One of the things Martin would say to keep me close was … kind of a fear thing…”think of the jerks you could have dated who would have mistreated you…you want to go through that?” haha…Funny.
A flag showing the Enterprising Britain logo as a permanent physical memento of the winner’s success.
Yet another reason why a future British National Party government must remove people like Cunningham from their positions of power and strip them of their pensions.
I met Christine, Phil, Kimi and Shaun not long after they'd left school. In St. Louis to be exact, during an unschooling conference at which I spoke. Kimi and Sierra became friends and over the years we met up with them at various locations in the U.S. for gatherings or conferences. They travel in their RV a lot so they get around! Kimi and Shaun are engaging, bright and interesting young people to chat with. I've always enjoyed their perspective and time with the entire family. It's obvious their children are not sheltered and are being exposed to FAR more than the average child their age.
During the ’90s he spent much of his time away from music, dealing with crack addiction and spending time at the Betty Ford Clinic plus the Long Island Center for Recovery. Charges of domestic violence and driving with a suspended license meant he was in and out of jail again during these times and with Public Enemy on hiatus, Flavmade his money by scalping baseball tickets around the Bronx. In 2003, on a suggestion from Chuck D, he moved back to the West Coast. Sought out by the producers of the show, Flavor joined the cast of the reality show The Surreal Life in 2004, living with the likes of Charo and Dave Coulier while falling in love with the Amazon of the house, Brigitte Nielsen. In 2005, the couple’s love affair continued on the spinoff series Strange Love, but when the relationship ended in 2006, it spun off another Flavor-centered series, Flavor of Love, which would last for three seasons. Now back on top, the rapper released his debut solo album, Flavor Flav, in 2006 and suffered the jabs of Katt Williams, Patton Oswalt, Lisa Lampanelli, and others when The Comedy Central Roast of Flavor Flav aired in 2007. A year later he became a featured actor on the myNetworkTV sitcom Under One Roof.
Contact us with the information below.
A fact that has bowled me over somewhat is how ambiguous terminology, which I have come to recognize as terms used to describe the machinations of satan (antichrist) on earth, are not spoken anymore in undertones, but are literally being shouted from the rooftops, with little regard whether people consider the subject matter a conspiracy theory, or not.
E erie winds along the streets
I began to anticipate about this a brace weeks ago, if I recommended Red Asleep Redemption to a customer, citation a complete ten-out-of-ten analysis as affirmation of its quality. His acknowledgment was dismissive: "There's no such affair as a complete ten," he claimed. Touché, I thought. Even I can abandoned anticipate of a scattering of amateur I would accord a ten-out-of-ten score. Does that beggarly those amateur are perfect? Are they afterwards flaws, glitches, or arresting moments? Do they exhausted expectations in aggregate they advance to do? Put simply, no, they do not. So how do I absolve giving a 10/10 to a bold that is not in actuality perfect? Because it in actuality is not that simple.
“You picked a lemon, throw it away lemonade is overrated. Freaks should remain at the circus, not in your apartment. You already have one asshole. You don’t need another. Make a space in your life for the glorious things you deserve. Have faith.”
Reykjavík! is currently working on a follow-up LP with renowned noise master, Ben Frost, while continuing to dazzle audiences with their live performances and top every critic’s poll in sight.
Whoever started this trend of designer collaborations with high street brands particularly H&M has to be patting himself in the back now. Its such a genius idea really. It makes certain designer brands more accessible while upping the cachet of high street. The thing I realized once I had left the zone and could observe the people to my heart's content is how varied the people inside were. You literally had all sorts of women--young fashionistas, old to be my mother types, working women and social wise- I think they came from all strata. There were a number of women there who looked like they could clearly afford the "real"Marni but had nonetheless been in line and had grabbed stuff for themselves. One woman even did the queue twice!! Is it because they're Marni fans and as such, will buy at any price? Are they looking for a deal?
Actual item is pictured. What you see in picture is what you get.
If Mr. Romney were to resort to the extreme hypothetical of claiming what someone else would not have done, he could say, with considerably more credibility, that he saved the 2002 Olympics and Mr. Obama would not have.
Supporting Actor: Christopher Plummer, Beginners
The President hastily scribbles something on a Post-It pad and hands it to the receptionist. He summarily grabs from her hand the memo she couldn't read. She leaves the Oval Office to read the note. For the third time she knocks on the door and peeks in.
Dams - There are two. You may be able to slide over them on the way out if the water is high enough but you will need to get out of your boat and drag it back the other way. It's actually a lot of fun even if I totally sunk my kayak on one. A dry bag is a great idea. Wish I had brought mine.
Frigatebirds are stiking creatures. In fact, the frigatebird species most likely to be observed in or near Texas is named the Magnificent Frigatebird (Fregata magnificens). They have huge wingspans at seven and a half feet, comparable to those of Bald Eagles. By comparison, a frigatebird would seem to dwarf the familiar Red-tailed Hawk and its four-foot wingspread. The frigatebird’s size and unusual appearance would instantly attract attention, especially if it were to be seen in desert or prairie environments, far from its normal haunts in the farthest reaches of the open sea. As unlikely as this may appear at first glance, frigatebirds DO sometimes wander inland.
Stamps - Skipping Stones (Beautiful Botanicals)
I've put in an official complaint. This simply isn't good enough. The price I pay for my annual dream package is astronomical, and then I don't even get what I signed up for. I don't even get the requested number of dreams per night. I'm supposed to have a hundred and it's more like half a dozen. And then they're in black and white instead of colour. What do you have to do to get a decent service, eh? I might as well not dream at all.
Rayloth turned to Jerf. “Maybe you should head back to the ship,” he told the young Cathar, his voice indicating understanding rather than conveying an order.
Holtby has now gone 25 straight starts in the NHL – including nine in the 2012 Stanley Cup playoffs – without suffering back-to-back setbacks.
This may come as a shock, but I am not often associated with two genres of music....rap and opera. I know, I know it's surprising but given my general whiteness, my punk rock background and my gangly tall stature, people just don't usually see my inner bling. Or my inner high C.
I thought I would wear my favourite black hunza style, 80s bodycon dress as a skirt to show the tights to their advantage and I'm wearing my aztec style chunky knit jumper and brown suede Pavers boots to complete this winter look.
We traveled, we laughed, we sang, we danced. I trusted you. And you were only the third boy I ever had sex with. I think I learned a lot from you, but mostly in the abstract how I relate to my sexuality way, not in the way your first boyfriend teaches you about sex.
Players are a type of boys who will fill your mind with sweet nothings, letting you fall for their trap. Mostly this boys are capable of doing it to anyone who can’t discern what is a player. if your guy exhibits 3 or more signs of this, he is an absolute player.
Next is a tree that I cannot remember seeing before and sadly I neglected to make a note of the owner’s name, though my guess would be that they come from Spain or France. I really liked this tree, not too big and with great character of age about it. Excellent flaky bark of a pale grey colour. This last detail illustrates just how varied the species can be across the wide geographical range that it occupies in northern Europe. It is quite different from the P. sylvestris that we see in Scotland.
Internets, we are in the wrong business.
My little princess is growing, she going to blow 3 candles today. One thing that has increased over these years is her sweetness as well as naughtiness. She wants to do everything that we are doing. She imitates even breast feeding of her little brother. She loves to play and also watch other kids playing through the window.
L stopped by yesterday afternoon to chat and see her old home. In our conversation about relationships - the freedom I have with X - he treats me like an adult that can take care of herself - go figure, I am. Then it came up that CEF was the opposite - he is the opposite of X in every way - which is why I'm still with X and I would like to never hear from CEF again. Now we've discussed why I blog anonymously, why I am more vague than I really should be, my militancy about secrecy apparently is about as effective as the US/Canada boarder. It works most of the time, but well there are moments you do not ever anticipate.
1) Issue a public statement condemning Israel's attack on Palestinian educational institutions, including the bombing of the Islamic University of Gaza, and encourage your colleagues in the other Universities to issue a similar call.
Drag: Let me guess: a place where bananas could have an outlet for their aggressions?
Maybe it's because of the bartenders' demeanor, but something makes the crowd in this place extra friendly, and extra interesting. You're surrounded by the beautiful hipster elite, but on a given night, you might exchange stories with a just-out-of-jail magician (true story), a freckled local musician, or a guy who runs his own local brewery and hosts free barbecues for the community throughout the summer. It just feels good to be in this place. Can we please make plans to go?
Prudent Purple Heirloom tomatoes, Green Beans, Cucumbers,
Season 2:
This once-ridiculously talented Wolverine QB was seduced by the Dark Side's money (a Buckeye, no less) to play baseball in an effort to cripple the Michigan football team, so he's kind of a traitor, but that's all in the past.
into trouble drawing while sitting in Church. Keep in mind, I was
Did my 100-ups (minor ones).
I hope Pam was there to catch this Dixie, as I was able to help her Dixie? I think it's a fair trade, perhaps another plan that came together in some extreme way? I'll never understand the rhyme or reason...it IS what it is... and life goes on, because I'm sure there is another one who needs me.
Then, what is bribery? – a form of pecuniary corruption, is an act implying money or gift given that alters the behavior of the recipient.
He adores his momma, and loves to shower me with kisses.
(Note: For further reading about the possibility of a return to virtue or the pursuit of the civic state, you won’t do better than my personal favorite web zine, Front Porch Republic.)
The funny thing about all that nothing is that it seemed to have allowed me to de-stress enough and stop thinking about The Nine enough to let my brain make some progress in the background on it. I’ve a basic idea of how I want to handle a bunch of things, including one of the knottier issues I was facing, and I don’t feel nearly as pressured about this being the close of the trilogy anymore. Hell, I was joking about it today, and for those of you who don’t know me all that well, that means I’m not worried about it. It’s when I lose any ability to tell jokes about a subject that you know I’m suffering some serious angst about it.
I am not saying I can’t do it - as we all know it is a necessity, but it takes an effort of will unless what I need to know is absolutely essential to the story. When I persist I discover that fact is often more interesting than fiction and patience is not only a virtue but a prerequisite for anyone trying to write a historical novel. Facts however have to be more than merely true in order to find a place in a narrative.
That man is our host tonight.
The company is looking to recruit engineering talent in the areas of high scale computing, network infrastructure, systems administration and big data.
from a fantastic design portfolio, you also have a popular blog that is full of great ideas, thoughts and your favorite things. I love the title - Live. Like. You. YES! I am true believer in this idea and how important it is to live your best self in your home and in your life. I especially love your PERSONALITY section where you provide entire room inspiration based on emotions (A Happy Home? Yep, I'll take that one. And the gorgeous blue chandelier too) Share your thoughts on "living
We are fortunate in that this year’s conference is receiving financial support from the Centre for Liberal Arts and Social Sciences at Nanyang Technological University. Thanks to this support, we are, for this year only, able to waive registration fees in order to help offset the higher cost of staying in Singapore compared to other Southeast Asian cities (it was recently ranked as having the highest hotel room rates in Asia).
We are both exhausted.
China’s aircraft carrier ambitions should not threaten regional security and stability, the US Department of Defense said Wednesday. “We hope that China’s carrier ambitions will not adversely affect regional security and stability,” the Pentagon’s …
Here are a couple of shots from a wedding I photographed back in July. I have to thank my cousin and god mother Natalie (and maid of honour) for mentioning me to Sarah, or else I wouldn’t have ever got this job.
“The visual arts are frivolity. I have weighed the facts, child, and cannot accept you. I’m sorry.”
Indeed, I became quite intrigued by the island’s churches instead. They were large, daunting stone structures, laid out by Jesuits in the 1600’s and 1700’s. The buildings had impressive thick walls, baroque altar-pieces and lavish painted ceilings.
What is the network: A podcast, a website blog, integrated with twitter and FB and YouTube.
Lorraine Candy is editor-in-chief of Elle
Here is a picture taken with my phone.
when she's flies back to California.
The building was undergoing renovation when we were there. Half was finished, a quarter was more or less finished but still under scaffolding, and the remaining quarter - the church - had yet to be begun. Three states visible together. One end crisp white render contrasting with the pale clean exposed concrete. The middle under wraps, new double glazing panes lined up in the corridor. The other end looking slightly grubby, the render and the concrete hard to distinguish from one another.
The best part of course is the nonsense spewed by the Gauteng Manager of Metrorail: “We cannot tolerate such actions from commuters that refuse to pay for services and we will intensify our efforts to work with the police and the community at large to ensure that the perpetrators are arrested”. Why were these thugs not arrested on the scene? What do you have to wait for?
Belfast also commemorated the sinking of the liner with an MTV concert and a memorial service were Sinn Feinn’s Lord Mayor Niall Ó Donnghaile, revealed a plaque featuring all the names of those who died on the Titanic.
This is one of my two favorites. It dates to about 1994. Way back in 1994, I would've thought the giant interlocking C's were terribly vulgar. Showy. Far, far too logo-y. Now I don't. I can't tell whether accessories have gotten so crazily logo-rific that this bag seems comparatively understated ... or that I've blunted my senses by carrying around a Coach grafitti-print tote that says POPPY all over it. Probably both.
The incident pushed Live Oak and Morgan Hill into the national media spotlight. On May 6, about 200 mostly Hispanic teens marched through Morgan Hill as a sign of protest; on May 7, the school district issued an apology and Smith said he did not agree with the decision made; on May 8, more than 100 Tea Party members rallied in downtown to support the four students, who also attended; and on May 11, several hundred locals and many media outlets covered the school board meeting that addressed the May 5 event.
Find a liquid soap with an aroma that’s pleasing. It will make your dishwashing experience a more pleasurable one and your hands will smell great.
Having wounded me.
He also attacked Singapore for being a well-known ‘inferior product’ and described the standards of public hygiene in Singapore as being ‘deplorable’.
Several more kneeling events. I could see my knee bone thru kneeling holes.
So today I have spent the day sitting at my computer catching up on everything - including my blog :)
2. Return water to a boil over high heat. Add asparagus and 1/2 teaspoon salt. Cook until asparagus is crisp-tender, about 2 minutes. Drain.
And this little guy.
Nonetheless, five entire temples have been discovered so far, locked down there in old lava: the Morangan, Gampingan, Kadisoko, Sambisari and Kimpulan temples, "buried between 2 and 9 meters deep." That's nearly thirty feet of rock—a once-liquid landscape covering blurred remnants of an otherwise overwritten past, architectural history by way of subterranean remote-sensing.
Slice the dragon fruit down the middle and scoop out all the nice flesh, with a spoon. It’s very soft, so this is easy. Chop the fruit into small chunks and puree in a food processor, or blender, till smooth. Dissolve the sugar into the lemon juice and water, by heating it in a saucepan over medium, or in the microwave. Once it’s cooled down, stir it into the dragon fruit puree and refrigerate for about an hour. Then pour the mixture in your ice cream maker and follow your manufacturers directions. Transfer to a bowl, and cover closely with plastic wrap. Freeze till ready to serve. Since it’s mostly fruit juice and water, it may harden quite a bit. Remove from the freezer and allow to sit and soften a few minutes before scooping, or zap it for a couple seconds in the microwave!
1) A very large (45" x 70") and heavy (130 lbs) mirror. We've actually hung this mirror twice using a French Cleat ... the first location was our Den, pictured below, and now this mirror hangs in our Dining Room (I hope to post our finished Dining Room soon). Because the French Cleat makes the hanging process quick and easy David couldn't even give me a hard time about moving the mirror!
I remember the back streets of Naples
1 cogent
Collective intelligence to Collaborative intelligence
I've been drinking Pink drink #1 all three days because that's the only thing I had all the ingredients for. There is no hemp protein powder to be had in Shall Oat but I did find coconut water and liquid stevia at the GNC. GNC is conveniently located next door to Subway, I took Junior to dinner there last night. I needed some working time tonight and it was easier to buy him a pizza than cook two meals at home. Subway smelled DELICIOUS and thinking about how it smelled is making my tummy grumble right now! He ended up only eating one quarter of the pizza so it was very easy to pack his lunch today!
them.
Erle Frayne D. Argonza
After the riot was brought under control, I asked, "What if I don't know what program I am going to take?"
He didn’t take precious time to explain that Ananias had been afraid of him. But he did say two important things about this man. Again I am looking at Acts 22:12. He had “a good report of all the Jews which dwelt there.” He was trustworthy, a man of integrity and respected of all. All who knew him thought well of him. In other words, he was a good reference.
So that’s it, more fun music to drool over. Until next time…
The term solstice is derived from the Latin words for "sun" and "to stand still."
Which logically only leads to one answer:
A delicious steamed pudding stogged full of scrummy almond flavour and slathered with morello cherry preserves. Served with a custard sauce, this is old school, stodge, deliciousness!
The main theme is a soft medley that is well orchestrated and memorable. The soundtrack has a lot of ambient music, more orchestrated medleys that pick up in tempo when it needs set the mood.
Kappel said police are looking for a silver or white Chrysler 300 four-door sedan with low-profile tires and large rims. Anyone with information about the incident is asked to call 9-1-1 or the Seattle police.
1 cup sweetened flaked coconut
Hunt monsters up to 11 levels lower or higher than you to get 50 of those.
Perhaps for the first time, human kind has the capacity to create more information than anyone can absorb, to foster far greater interdependency than anyone can manage, and to accelerate change far faster than anyone’s ability to keep pace. Certainly the scale of complexity is without precedent.
I sat in the car and waited…….and waited……..and……waited some more.
Suitable for both day and night look, this bracelet rocks the college/university dress-code and ALSO, night-time chillouts with friends (;
Today I got back out there, but this time I was armed with my garden plan that I came up with this morning. I knew what I wanted to move, and where (mostly). It felt great to get a bed cleared out, and everything happy in their new places.
But then I had a bittersweet phone conversation on Skype and met beautiful little Laura. And the next evening my best friends and husband stepped in at just the right time and organized another, delayed birthday party for me. Just to remind me that I am one lucky girl, with lots of great friends and a job to keep me safe and comfortable.
I'm enjoying my bike rides. I take my camera and try to be more aware of the smells, beauty, and people that I see.
So she and I were sitting there reading about Eratosthenes and his measurements of the pillars in both Alexandria and Syene, and deducing the shape of the Earth.
This weekend, I found this cute little dress in the 75% off area in a local boutique:
The drama of leaving home and the first magical days in Madrid. Again, sorry for the lack of pictures. I haven’t uploaded them to the computer yet. My bad.
Melt the margarine in a saucepan and add the peanut butter. Stir until melted and dissolved. Add the sugar by the cup and stir until completely incorporated. Put the fudge in a pan that is suitable for your desired thickness of the fudge. Chill until firm (about 45 minutes) and cut in cubes.
Her legs trembled and she forgot all about Dr. Dante, the pistol, and even Abby. "Eli." Her voice came out in a croak.
"Woo, Nash! That's my man!" Tracy shrieks, cupping her hands to her face. She stands up, wiggling her bottom. "Nash! Hey, Nash! Marry me! I love you!"
A light left on in the living room,
Many will camp out here and there, out of the wind and the rain and the cold, hoping soon to find a job that can help them get out of the rain.
Recently, we had a family photo shoot done with our favourite photographer LaBelle Photographics. As always, I am super impressed with the end result - I love them all :-). We all had so much fun on the day - the kids just loved the balloons!
Here’s John, seriously looking at some birds …
Some piano jazz, seduced with some trumpet, echoed throughout the small apartment.
It’s important to be familiar with the paper, its reporters and their beats, because if one reporter on a particular story is unavailable for interviews, I need to try to find another reporter to jump in. If I know The Times is working on an investigative piece or is preparing to break a big story, part of my job is to do advance outreach to producers to reserve air time for reporter interviews and make sure The Times gets credit for the news scoop.
In the car, I’m thinking, yet again, how people are ‘judged’, ‘categorised’…
1/4 tea chilli powder, or more to your liking
Until this nation insists that it's codes of decency and it's laws are followed once again by all members of the community we must expect these murders to continue, if not increase, in line with the demographic of the section of the population which commits them.
I completed the course over a week, but did not receive my final documents.
Don’t have an attitude if you want a quality interview. A confrontational approach is less likely to get good information.
I have been so busy with school, but I'm finally on winter holiday! Here are some of my greatest finds lately, and an outfit that's quite representative of the sort of things I've been wearing of late (a.k.a. dull and practical!).
I’m not saying that the senses or the mind are bad. But we must learn to discriminate between things and be aware of what is happening at all times; that is when clarity dawns on us. This is the first step towards the higher state of consciousness.
The statement also emphasised that “the hijab or headscarf is completely different to the niqaab, or full face veil, which is also worn by Muslim women.”
When I’m not in a rush to have the soup, I like to let it rest overnight in the fridge, skim off the fat in the morning, and add in fresh veggies so that there is something to chew (don’t get lazy, teeth!). Other than that, this is a pretty straight-forward recipe. Simple, delicious. What more could you ask for?
Gift #2: Man Body Scrub
Both contain Oxybenzone - there is debate on whether or not this is safe for use. I googled and read both sides of the debate. While it may be perfectly safe....do I really want to risk it with my kids?? I'd feel a lot better of waiting for them to make up their minds, rather than having my kids be lab rats to test it out!
* Transmission Manager
“Actually,” piped up the tunnel-keeper, “I am trying to play with your minds to drive a wedge or two between you, etc. etc. in the hope that your squabbling impairs your ability to choose wisely and ultimately leads to your INSTANT DEATH.”
“I’ve heard too many churches say that they are not reaching people because they are too busy making disciples. A few things to consider here…
1 tub fat free cool whip
Marcus Coates
My first NaNoWriMo gave me this story.
The above activities; Wintery Scenes, Dressing Up the Children and the Snowman Counting Game are all great for Fine Motor Development. In addition, this month we explored with Shaving Cream! After a few squirts of it on a table, the children drew circles/designs with their fingers and practiced scraping it off with a small windshield scrapper. We talked about how the Shaving Cream was “white” just like snow.
Wholesale orders are still being taken.
"After five years of reductions in family class immigration under the Harper government, Liberals will restore balance by increasing family class visas."Balance eh? These family class visas are the ones that certain scammers and schemers use to marry off mentally handicapped relatives to complete strangers to "get" their entire extended families to Canada, taking immigration policy out of the hands of Canadians and into the mitts of fraudsters and crooks. Nice.
1. The intellectual questioning of ideas believed to be true should be encouraged. Explaining/arguing why these ideas are right keeps them from becoming “a dead dogma” and instead a “living truth.” If we being to simply follow rules, we forget WHY they are there, then they are easier to shrug off when they become inconvenient.
1 large cauliflower, cut into bitesize florets
I brought him straight to the laundry room where I could put him on top of the washing machine and examine him. My suspicions were confirmed.
I use a LOT of digital papers, so I had to find ways to make it economically viable. I have some tips for you where money is concerned... although it is not as expensive as you may think. I have to replace my inks about 4 times a year - seriously. And remember I use a lot. :) I have a Canon inkjet printer - nothing special or fancy - and it doesn't seem to guzzle ink.
The cost is for the complete program with CD and Smokeless Cigarette Included
screamed releasing
Held at the Washington Hilton Hotel in Washington, D.C, on Saturday night, stars who exclusively invited to the premiere event wore their most glamorous dress for a once in a lifetime meeting with the U.S. President Barack Obama and his First Lady Michelle Obama together with many government officials.
Another glimpse into the ride that is jimi and kat.
I keep promising myself that I'll "find my desk." And then I go and put another 30 books on hold for my Wee Reads group.
And don't forget, I need advice on how to focus and not get distra...... oooh look: a bird!!
Dengue Fever is caused when you're bit by the certain mosquito that can carry the Dengue virus. 7-10 days later you begin to show symptoms. Usually it begins with a sudden high fever and body aches. Both of these worsen as the disease takes its course, and are followed by headaches, nausea, and eye aches. The Dengue virus attacks your white blood cells and your platelets, throughout the course of the disease your platelets continually drop, your blood thins, and your liver begins to work overtime. It can take a month or two for your liver function to return to normal, and it can take a month for you to get your energy back to normal after the Dengue virus is gone from your body.
So here is a recipe that I've made on Monday night, simple dessert for hubby and baby before they eat dinner. This is based on the ingredients that I had that day. Basically you can use any fruits that can be complemented with yogurt. Mine, I have strawbery and mango which i put in layers. Example, arrange 1st layer with mango then yogurt, later strawberry and yogurt again. Lastly I sprinkle the granola on top. Or else you can layer it in the middle as well. Taste??...They like it very much!...Cam hubby ni suke healthy stuff so got compliment from him la. hehehe
Those of us who spend a lot of time with him here in Sacramento agree with his mother, Monique – her son is a big teddy bear, a ferocious competitor, with a tremendous sense of humor and instincts for the game. Immature, true. There is some of that. But while USAB officials live in fear of an international incident, I have covered most of the Summer Games since 1992, and I would have no problems putting Cousins on the Olympic team.
“A king’s rage is like the roar of a lion,
"They're not meaning to be experts on sexuality, they're not meaning to be experts on orientation, but they are providing pastoral ministry to parents and students at a very difficult time in someone's life as they come to terms and come to the freedom of their orientation," Hightower said.
I remember myself as a teen. If I were hustled into a couseling office, a clipboard taken out and I were peppered with questions about my lack of faith...
It's a year this week since myself and Doug flew to America, it feels like a very strange and surreal dream, did we really get asked to come all that way to show how we do what we do? Did we actually spend virtually the whole of April travelling around the east coast being wined and dine and meeting wonderful people and seeing beautiful places and showing our pots and how we make them? Incredible. If it's true then blimey! Amazing. If it's a dream, what a fun dream to have had and maybe I'll actually come to America one day and travel around and show my pots...
The giveaway runs from Thursday, January 27th through Tuesday, January 31st.
that she arrived with friends.
All those times we exert control over our children, we are taking away chances for them to control themselves. How do we expect our children to learn "self-control" if we don't let them practice it?
Arrange the smoking ingredients on the bottom of the wok.
India at that time was put in economic cooperation. Due to various reasons, India did not positively promote the “Look East Policy” at that time and the Southeast Asian countries had paid their attention to East Asia and underestimated India. Subsequently, the “Look East Policy” did not exert obvious effects.
6. Natural Thoughts
That’s it for now. In the next post we will further dive into monitoring aspects and discuss major market players and pros and cons of them.
/proc – /proc proc – no -
And it is now your task to become fully conscious in your everyday experience of life.
Every saint drags a ghost, and demons
Keep your complexion in mind. I have found I rarely ever wear something that does not suit my complexion. Accessories included. If you are fair skinned, a pastel butter cup yellow (top photo) works best.
The Kings Army, ably commanded by Goring fired the Saker, felling some of the Trained Bands (red coats), and a fusilade from the fire locks. The Life Guards advanced to the lower slopes of thier hill, and the Cav moved forward more boldly than the Roundheads.
These short, periodical times
The events played out in games are presumably this kind of juncture. The interference of the true grid could be represented by a roll made on a suitable die at the start of each unit of time. If the result of the roll is a number higher than the number of the unit of time, one randomly determined entity comes under the control of another player for that period, although it may not be made to act directly against its interests.
When using a tracking method like this, another thing to consider is if the number displayed/markers present show the amount of wounds suffered or the amount of wounds left. I am leaning towards tracking the amount of wounds remaining, since I think that is easier for my opponent. If I track the wounds suffered, then my opponent has to know how many wounds my model has to start with to know how many are left.
I should be thankful for everything, anything, the abundance, the choice, the too too much everywhere. But rather than piling up warming embers of gratitude on my chilled heart, all I'm getting is a steaming pile of should.
Both Messers. Ferguson and Kiraly have been arrested, but police are seeking Ms. Applegate.
“Are you alive, or not? Is there nothing in your head?”
Anyway I recently met up with a guy I met coincidentally at my union though he was not a student nor part of my university. He was a guy who had just had a job interview and was just sitting in a room waiting for the time to pass so that he could catch his train. I happened to stumble along the empty room with only himself there and decided to sit and write some stuff, but then we got chatting. Exchanged details and next thing you know four months later we meet up. Except this time he is very very nervous and apparently useless with all technology. Now it may be because he is 25 and pretty useless with remembering to text/email/facebook, (so many different social mediums there is no escape and no EXCUSE for not being able to contact the other person! I am not going to make excuses for anyone and I am not going to sit here and think about all the possible excuses on his behalf- waste of my time if you ask me. He arrives 25 minutes late and fails to text me to let me know. I am not impressed. Like I said no excuse for that unless someone died. I like it when someone can be straight with me. Most guys are very mysterious or at least try to be because they think it will make them more interesting. Well here’s a tip it WON’T! It just gets too damn annoying after a while and it is difficult to know what someone thinks about you unless you can read minds. If only I had that gift- mind you I could see how it would be a curse rather than a gift. Especially if they were not thinking pretty thoughts. Anyway guys seem to be hot or cold- they have no idea what they want- well most of them don’t and they seem to be pretty useless. But you can’t seem to live without them! I think I would go insane if I lived on a planet with girls only- we would eventually all kill each other! Point is I am not a mind reader and no I do not think you keeping me waiting will cut it. I also do not think you not being able to text back considering the various modes of interactions we have nowadays excuses you from not being able to contact me. So I give up, if you want to be elusive- your call and your loss of a friend!
That there was little public outcry from political campaigns does not mean the decision lacked controversy though. The broadcasters fought it, arguing it would be costly and time-consuming to post the information online and that it could provide new insights for competitors.
mr has a new "look" that just drives me crazy seeing it. like he's so confused about what he could possibly have done wrong. i honestly hate that look. not sure where it came from, but it's new, and very annoying. as soon as he does it, it's the sure sign that he's lying. and boy has he been pulling doozies lately, ugh. he's my finally attached little sweetheart, that's just being a big weenie!
1- What car are you now driving?
And if all goes well, there is no feeling sweeter than parental pride (whether it’s deserved or not).
Justin Bieber Singing Dolls items
What I have reevaluated through all of this though is the conversation we're having which should be about euthanizing too early NOT about suffering. Pain doesn't go with you when you pass so holding on a couple of more days just to be sure is not unusually or unnecessarily cruel.
After Hawaii introduced HOPE in 2004, the rate of missed and failed drug tests dropped by nearly 80 percent. A probationer in HOPE is 55 percent less likely to be arrested for a new crime than one who is not in HOPE. As a result, HOPE probationers are sentenced to about 50 percent fewer days of jail time.
So here's my rule. Someone asks me to do/be/pay for/go to something I just don't have room for. "Oh, I can't, I'm sorry, but thank you for asking." The ball is in their court. They can either be awesome like my friend and realize that everyone can't do everything. OR, they can try to pitch some guilt into the equation. Ouch. Guilt is hard. They "only" need "one more person" or some such nonsense for their whatever-it-is to be perfect. That's their issue, not yours. It's not your job to make stuff perfect.
Director Tim Webb worked with autistic children and adults whose artwork informed the visual style of the film, as well as describing their experiences in the soundtrack.
I fell in love with this house the moment I walked into it. I know it's hard to see past all the mess, but I have a vision beyond the ugly. Someday, my family and I won't be living in a construction site. In the meantime, we'll be pinching pennies and dreaming of better days when we can kick our feet up and enjoy our dream home.
-”She’s too.” He smiled benignly.
In the 1950's there was actually a debate in Australia about whether television broadcasting should be allowed. I think, on balance, that we'd be better off if the opposers had won. That's something I wouldn't have expected to write in earnest 30 years ago. Now it seems the most natural and sensible conclusion to come to.
Its easy for me to want people to think the same way as I think. As I talk and type want others to understand the way I understand, but that’s not sharing God that’s sharing yet another photocopy of God, the thing I hate the most. How can we present who God is, the message and scripture without simply creating another copy? How do we make the filter or flavor we add to the gospel as minimal as possible so that when it comes to share our faith it doesn’t come across as some good rules to live by, some special promises for those who follow what God says? How do we share in a way that brings people to a raw encounter with the reality, truth, power and love of the person of Jesus and the Father God?
I can't complain. I love my children and husband. I love staying home and being there for my kids. I love teaching after-school art. I love writing and painting in my spare time. So, why the funk? That I'm unclear about. I know that it's natural for people to feel down when they hit the near mid-point of their life. I guess I didn't think I would be one of those people feeling down. And yet here I am.
It’s bit unsettling for me that AB sold out to InBev because it quickly untied a thread of our American culture. By the way, Anheuser-Busch InBev just cut 1400 jobs, 6% of their total workforce just week after their $53 billion takeover - an insight of what’s to come.
If Spain and Italy do look sound enough at the end of two years, European political leaders can allow Greece to default without fear of dangerous contagion. Portugal might follow Greece in a sovereign default and in leaving the eurozone. But the larger countries would be able to fund themselves at reasonable interest rates, and the current eurozone system could continue.
3. Pour the mixture into the prepared tin and bake for 40- 45 minutes, until it feels firm and springy when you press it in the centre. Cool in the tin for 5 minutes, then turn it out, peel off the paper and cool on a wire rack. (You can freeze the cake at this point.)
Penguins
The two views are not incompatible but complimentary. The scientific view drives Science Fiction and the magical view drives Fantasy genres. But in the current marketplace, the two views are starting to blend into one, producing some remarkable fiction, SFR being one example.
If all you could see in your photo was that lovely sunset with a silhouette of your friend, that means you (or your camera for you semi-auto* mode users) metered for the sky.
Quote: “Aw, people can come up with statistics to prove anything, Kent. Forfty percent of all people know that.”
with you
I guess you could say I'm a bit stubborn and unrealistic when it comes to some of the decisions I make and the thoughts I have. I'm a dreamer to say the least, and always believe that things will work out in the end with only the smallest amount of effort. Needless to say, I am 100% wrong. With everything that is going on in my life regarding grades, money problems, boys, etc.... I'm slowly beginning to wonder why I act how I act. When it comes to stressful situations, I don't really know how to handle them. I generally push them deeper and deeper into my subconscious, and pray that they never come back out. In the end, they always do.
Our thoughts of you are filled with pride.
This is Allison.
#2 You Try To Do It All On Your Own
Is war, or the use of military intervention, ever justified in the pursuit of peace? How do we engage in concrete practices that prevent violent conflict? How is real security achieved? And what implications do our answers have for the life and witness of the church?
Entwined
I know when I lay out in the sun and get a tan, I can notice how dry my skin is, specially on a dark complex, it's almost like an ashy color. I have used other lotions in the past that didn't keep my legs looking moisturized all day, it would wear off in a few hours, but with the Udder Cream, it lasted all day, leaving my legs looking silky and smooth! And let me tell you, not only can you see the difference, you can feel it too! No more alligator legs for me! I really love the light scent this Udder Cream has, it's not to strong, just subtle to know it's there. This lotion is perfect for your whole body, and will smooth out roughness and soften your skin!
As every year it seemed that the summer holidays were here for an eternity out here in Romania. The kids go on holiday about the 2nd week in June and go back to school in the middle of September.
No matter what this meant... I knew one thing. God wanted me to hope. It seems like every time I give up and surrender the hope for a baby, He just will not allow it. And this time, He was adamant.
Effective network security strategy involves identifying the relevant threats or vulnerabilities, and deploying effective tools to overcome such threats.
A few weeks ago, before my life was consumed with correcting exams, processing grades and nailing down details for my upcoming wedding, we took a trip to Eskişehir. It is about an hour an a half on the fast train. The train was great. It ran frequently all day, was clean and convenient.
And, of course, that’s NOTHING like being on a real team with real stakes and real purpose. I’m sure it’s not fun to sit in a hot dugout day after day when you don’t pitch, and it’s easy enough to duck into the clubhouse and half pay attention to it on TV, and if you’re there you might as well get some food, and if you have some food you might as well drink some beer. I get that this isn’t Little League where everyone rushes to home plate to celebrate every home run hitter, and guys yell “Hey batter batter batter” to help the pitcher out. But you are still supposed to be in it together. If I can sit through “Edelweiss,” you can sit through a few innings of baseball.
Step 2: Watch YouTube videos on hand expressing milk and desperately try to take the edge of in the shower. I really couldn’t figure it and didn’t get much out.
"bend over and let me try it with your jeans on......... first"
building upon saliva’s
But back then? Well before VCRs, DVD, iTunes or NetFlix streaming, you had to wait for your favorite episodes to cycle back around in the rotation. Watching it on my little black and white television and its crappy little antenna as the show was broadcast on a low-power local UHF station, time of day and weather sometimes forced me to choose between having a picture or having sound. There was also the cartoon on Saturday mornings, (which also celebrates its own anniversary, having premiered 38 years ago today), toys, models, the occasional comic book or poster book or collection of James Blish episode adaptations, and the reruns. Always, the reruns.
In the end however, we were able to do the gravel basing for everything in the army, and do final touch up pieces for models ( such as the Banners, skulls, and lipstick for the wyches ). For the flock we almost got everything finished up, however there were 2 units left over that I had completed on Sunday. Varnish application was applied on Sunday also while it was again quite nice outside.
She made a name for herself in a style that was known at the time as a “Coon Shouter“, performing African American influenced songs. Not content with performing in the simpleminstrel traditions, Tucker hired some of the best African American singers of the time to give her lessons, and hired African American composers to write songs for her act.
He was taken to Lynchburg General Hospital, where he died Monday, Swisher said.
Back to God He ran His course.
my mom gave me from back in the 70's.
To see what messages
This American idiom speaks to the idea that you can only really learn the value of something if you experience it directly. It assumes that learning from the experience of others, both the good and the bad, is not a valid method of learning and applying that new knowledge. Today commit yourself to being keenly aware of others’ decision making patterns so that they can serve as an unofficial rule book of how to excel in all areas of life. That’s wisdom from God.
That stop sign has brought me to here and now. I hit the occasional pothole. Have some smooth road and still have to deal with the forks in the road. I have had people who have veered on to the road who have stopped to give directions. Some were helpful and others pointed me in the opposite direction. Some of them found the off ramp and others are still here on the road trip with me. I have no clue what the road in to the future looks like or how its paved. I have learned to pay attention to the signs and lights along the way. Listen to the guidance that given and if i chose to accept it great,if not I find a rest area til I get my directions better sorted.
Besides claiming descent from these Fallen Angels, the “Illuminati family" claim that it was from these Fallen Angels that they learned the “Ancient Wisdom” (aka the Kabbalah).
Themes + Style: Focuses a lot on philosophical approaches to life and the purpose of life. The themes introduced in FMA are sophisticated and complex, rarely seen in action-packed shounen manga. Although there are some typical shounen elements (eg. protecting others, the chosen one), the manga revolves heavily on darker aspects of human nature. Readers are bluntly introduced to corruption, powerlessness, war, unjust tragedies and finally toying with life. Between these severe themes lies the essence of brotherly love. The reader feels a strong tie between Edward and Alphonse Elric.
embroidery floss
I was reminded of why I love to cook with my first bite of this soup. Delicious, comforting, easy and nutritious - these are some adjectives that describe this stuff. Another one: balanced. All the flavours are just right, and while carrot & coriander soup is a classic, it's not boring. It's incredibly far elevated above the stuff you've eaten from a can. It actually made me feel good to eat it. I even slowed down for a while, stopped working, and savoured it.
“What it has done is make the selling a little bit more comfortable for our publishers and our sales people,” said Vesna Moore, circulation director for the Business Information Group. “They are able to go to buyers and say, if you want to buy a banner ad, you will reach 20,000 people and get 150,000 impressions in the month that you’re on our website. And here are numbers to substantiate that from a third party. I think it’s probably helped clinch the deal in a couple of different areas.”
And when the husband and the nightstand aren't reminding me of my mortality, my daughter's happy to help, as she did the other day:
Course 2- Salad: Bitter greens topped with gorgonzola and balsmaic vinaigrette paired with La Bestia
-Mo
$1.253 Trillion: Projected Federal Budget Deficit For FY2012. (CBO, 3/16/12)
“As readers of this site know, May 27, 2012, is the time that I have stated as being the date Jesus Christ will return as King of kings over all government on this earth. For such an event to come to pass, the Trumpets of Revelation must all sound, the United States and dollar collapse, the ten nations of Europe arise to fulfill the final revival of the Holy Roman Empire, and Russia with China must unite against Europe in WWIII.”
"O.K." I said. This is what we'll do. We are twenty minutes from Swindon. We'll call in at Swindon station. I'll explain the problem, and I'll sort something out."
Those have quite different forms of appearance.
DARYL DENHAM’S DRIVETIME (VIRGIN RADIO)
"Portrait of Vanessa Bell" by Duncan Grant, 1917-1918
To all the mothers and mothers in training out there (Baby boom here at work...this is why I'm not drinking the water here)...
It's also the company as well. These players are a really good group (not that my group was bad we just are stagnant IMHO). They are what you would call nearly professional gamers. Best of all the DM is this multitasking dude who is running us through Temple of Elemental Evil mixed seamlessly with the Pathfinder setting. Awesome...
I remember in my last few days in Ecuador, I was talking to my flatmate about how it will be difficult for us to leave, but for the children, they were so used to volunteers leaving month in, month out, that it did not make a huge difference to them. So did that mean that we should not give our utmost to them, simply because they would not be able to reciprocate in the same way? No, quite the opposite.
This week's M11 Conference provided a fresh wind of life to my soul, and no doubt thousands of others who attended. Worship services, seminars and visits with friends were such a great winter pick-up.
two brothers: Philip and Bartholomew
Some examples of “Plamen-inspired” paintings and drawings are below:
Can we just be honest here?
1 teaspoon of baking soda
I love seeing all of the beautiful tables that all you talented tablescapers have put together and one of the things that always catches my eye is the sterling flatware.
Don't pay attention to this first version of page five. It's horrible. But my post makes the most sense if I start with this image.
plunged into my palms in plush and feral
Tonight my favourite band from Winnipeg, Royal Canoe, are dropping by Toronto once again. They recently wowed me at Canadian Music Week, so I’m ready to watch their very fun live performance for the second time in a couple months. With six members, two of who play drums side-by-side (a music weakness of mine), their busy and fun dynamic is interesting and appealing. There’s a LOT of gear, everyone’s singing together and even some distortions they use are oddly groovy. Their quirky Extended Play EP will be on my top list of EPs this year for sure.
1/2 pound clean, crisp, raw spinach
8.The Christmas That Almost Wasn't
The prime minister, who just returned from the Asean Summit in Bali, Indonesia, said Malaysia was lucky that it was still in the developing country category and was capable of creating jobs for its people.
This week I may be watching my little great nephew Davian. His mama is my sister's oldest daughter, Katie. Katie is the French teacher over at the school. She is an amazing girl...childhood leukemia survivor, she has Krohn's disease, and has suffered immensely but has still been my kids' favorite teacher. Her daughter Grace is one of the best kids in this world, I was there when she was born. So I love her like my own. Anyway, Katie and her husband have a new baby, born at the end of January, Mr. Davian. He is SO beautiful. Katie is back to work, and daddy is a stay-at-home dad. Well, he has to go in to work sometimes, and that is where I come in. I am absolutely thrilled to have a chance to take care of this little guy. So I have my work cut out for me today. The regular Monday stuff, and staying out of the cake. I feel like just eating the whole thing and ending the battle, but it don't work like that.
Far and fair did I say?
Wikipedia:
OBSTACLES: Not many remember the gothic soap opera and those who are fans might just resent the more comic turn.
I haven't made a meal plan in eons and that is horrible because most days 6:40pm comes around, Matt gets home and I get the million dollar question "So...what's for dinner?" My answer is usually the same: "What do you want?" This does not normally translate into "I'll make whatever you want" but more likely into "Not a clue, can you just go to Burger King and get something?" So yes, meal plans are really essential around here especially considering I am still trying to lose weight, I'm only halfway there.
As they passed through a huge marble arch, the Weavers came out of the Sea Elf district and were in the shipyards.
He holds on to his hat as the wind picks up,
Owner Paul Adams said: "As well as giving guests a design conscious venue to stay, we wanted to give them a decadent, inspiring and seductive environment to enjoy."
Truer words could not be spoken. In examining my reaction, I remembered my first run-in with the slut-shaming machine at the tender age of nine. The conversation centered around a girl in our grade, whom I’ll call Kelly, and the “naughty area” on the other side of the playground fence where the older kids allegedly went to hook up.
In Business Cycles (PDF, 385 pages apparently), on page 209 Schumpeter attempts to present an extremely simplified or "clean" version of the interaction of business cycles. He limits his presentation to three cycles only, "for the sake of simplicity". He eliminates not only other cycles but also "external disturbances" and also "Seasonals and Growth". And he makes his three cycles as regular and unvarying as possible by using "three sine curves the amplitudes of which are proportional to their duration".
David had escaped Saul by going into Philistine. When the Philistine army gathered, David had gone forward to fight against Israel too.
I got your letter and was glad to find you had not forgotten Jourdon, and that you wanted me to come back and live with you again, promising to do better for me than anybody else can. I have often felt uneasy about you. I thought the Yankees would have hung you long before this for harboring Rebs they found at your house. I suppose they never heard about your going to Col. Martin’s to kill the Union soldier that was left by his company in their stable. Although you shot at me twice before I left you, I did not want to hear of your being hurt, and am glad you are still living. It would do me good to go back to the dear old home again and see Miss Mary and Miss Martha and Allen, Esther, Green, and Lee. Give my love to them all, and tell them I hope we will meet in the better world, if not in this. I would have gone back to see you all when I was working in the Nashville hospital, but one of the neighbors told me Henry intended to shoot me if he ever got a chance….
Last night I attended and read at what’s officially my first ever public open mic night reading. I’ve read a handful of pieces before in smaller, intimate groups at different writing conferences I’ve attended. Always surrounded by people that I know in some facet, even if only for a few moments, but always enough so that I know they’re going to be… nice? Last night though, was different… I arrived early in hopes of finding like-minded strangers interested in conversation… instead I sat alone, gripping my few printed pages and watching the podium and microphone in front of me as it grew a tail, fangs, horns, and leering yellow eyes… A group of strangers began arriving, gathering in the lower level of a local bookstore, all of them chattering eagerly with each other, making the monster before me grow even larger, and the knots in my stomach tighter, as I realized these people all knew one another. They knew each others style, voice, thoughts, opinions, and humor – whereas I, a tattooed trollope, had wandered aimlessly, naively into their lair, stupidly thinking that I might fit in.
A more thoughtful approach to the Pappy Van Winkle dinner I proposed above, one that would give you greater bang for the buck, is to invite four or five friends over for dinner with instructions that everyone bring one unopened bottle of whiskey. What? You thought that because you're hosting, you don't have to bring a bottle? Nice try. Preferably, all the whiskeys are of the same general type, so you've got a clutch of bourbons, or ryes, single malts, or even white whiskeys so you can compare. No need to drink it all. Everyone takes home one bottle at the end of the night. Maybe each bottle goes home with the diner who brought it, maybe with someone else. This way, you and your friends taste a variety of spirits, learn about personal preferences, and maybe settle on some heretofore unknown favorites. Set a price limit ($20, $30, $100, whatever your budget allows) so nobody feels slighted or outgunned.
different day, cool and wet, glistening in moonlight.
I can't beline we are at the 8m mark! That's almost as long as he was in my belly! (Ok I just heard the voice of Fat Bastard when I wrote "in my belly" lol)
JS - But the first time it was in the Premier League; two separate bodies.
I am writing because I’m addicted to blogging. No, no, no. That’s what my husband says (and I can’t deny it…), but I’m writing right now because I want to thank my family, friends and readers who sent heartwarming messages and well wishes for my younger daughter. Thank you so much, everyone!!
Hopefully next time I'm in Asia I'll be able to track down a good on tap/bottled source for this wonderful nectar....
Now this was one hell of a fun fight, and a near run thing at several points for the three of us. We went into the arena, got the discovery update, then rang the gong. Fyst came out and lectured us, then sent his champion in to take care of us.
That last step is a big one. Even after conducting what I consider to be in-depth online research via sources that are perceived to be highly reliable industry experts, I still had “a feeling” that I needed more. And out of all the options I had to fill that void (and there are plenty), I referred to a good ol friend. Hell, I made it easy for him! I basically begged him to pitch me on the phone and validate my positive feelings about it, which he did.
Loose Lips Sink Ships – Posted on April 13, 2012 by editor
May you all continue finding & following your passions in 2012.
Then there is the Parliament meeting from Sept 24 to Nov 27, where the Budget needs to be tabled.
In 1993 members of the Supreme Court, certain members of congress and representatives from the Clinton government meet with high ranking US military officers who were demanding a return to constitutional law, reforms of the banking system, and financial redress. They agreed to create the farm claims process which would allow the legal team to set up meetings all over the country on a grass roots level to help others file claims and to educate them about the lawsuit.
The most provocative element of this underground reality, however, was the dohta-maza conundrum. The self and its replicant, closely tied to the absence of a moral standard in the book. The dohta and maza remained just as troubling as they were outlined in the first three books. Murakami skirted the soundness of this formulation by making it part of the "belief system" of the cult. There was a danger of romanticizing the role of the novelist to the extent that whatever he dreamed up was to be accepted as is. Aomame herself had considered Leader's charismatic persona as "extraordinary" despite his sexual relations with pre-teenage girls.
He said, “Then what’s stopping you?”
Although the Boers thought they had at last found freedom from colonialism, they were wrong. The British Empire launched two more attempts to recolonize them - the second time being successful.
I don't know, but it seems like my path has been through thick brush and deep grass lately and the vision of where I'm going has occasionally gotten quite foggy so I've decided to stop moving forward. I need to sit on my proverbial toadstool and have a long talk with Musetta and Musella, my twin muse sisters. Of course that means I have to shut out the outside world and take those magical steps into the world of wonder where no one else dare venture. Closed doors, silent ambiance other than the soft sound of a muted Mozart piece playing in the next room. Of course there is always the danger of my mind going into lock-down, in which case the eyelids seem to grow quite heavy but it's a riskI must take. I don't know how you women do it. How can you maintain focus with all the demands of being the parent of a small child? You're amazing. I mean we've all heard the answer to that. Organization. discipline, commitment, blah, blah,blah. Words, just words. I guess a man just doesn't get it and never will.
Having a house in Pepys Road was like being in a casino in which you were guaranteed to be a winner. If you already lived there, you were rich. If you wanted to move there, you had to be rich. It was the first time in history this had ever been true. Britain had become a country of winners and losers, and all the people in the street, just by living there, had won.
will live again in the memories
The star-crowned cliffs seem hinged upon the sky,
Now if only I had taken some before photos!
7:30 – Mussels, Appomattox, The Press, I’m Turning Into @ The Bell House $8 (21+)
Michael Devine - Hand printed textiles are really so special. The handmade process is what makes the difference, makes the fabric truly a custom product.
And I don’t. There are many reasons why people believe things, but broadly speaking, because I’ve not had the idea hammered into my skull throughout my upbringing until it became a part of my worldview that it would be unthinkable to abandon, and because I’ve never been at a particularly emotionally vulnerable point in my life and turned to religion for solace or been taken advantage of, and because I’m not that irrational, I don’t believe that a god exists who expects and demands that I accept him as my saviour before allowing me any kind of post-mortem payoff. (Pardon the ever-so-slight generalisations there.)
NATO aircraft, including those supplied by the U.S., totaled 26,089 sorties and 9,618 strike sorties through Wednesday.
and let me not eat of their delicacies!"
from Leshii (Woodgoblin) No. 2, 1906
I suppose we are all influenced by seasonal rhythm and ritual more than we realize. I still expect SUMMER to begin on that last weekend of May. It feels strange to fret, in July, with early morning alarm bells, piano exams and school bags. The high point of the summer has passed, and yet here we are -- still limping along, trying to adhere to a routine that has lost its relevance. I'm sure that by the end of August I will long for routine again, but just now I'd like to lay in the grass and listen to the hum of insects.
“They have made a mockery of us, they have hurt our sentiments,” said N.R. Paul, a protest leader and resident in Dharavi, Asia’s largest slum.
The wedding went great! It was probably the most perfect day I have had in my life so far! A week after the wedding is when we moved. Over 2,000 miles across the U.S. we safely made it to Great Falls, Montana! Malmstrom is a small base, very secured, in which I like very much so! We stayed in TLF the first week we were here and was offered a house! THANK GOD!! I love my house so much!
-- 1 Corinthians 4:5 NLT
I’ve got a lot of praise for a lot of folks. But right now, I’d like to focus on Richard Samuel IV. Earlier in the summer, I made a post on what an outstanding team player he is and I even voiced some hope that Richard could be productive for us as a running back.
This was allot of fun if you need any ideas or have suggestions please let me know. Thanks for stopping by and have a good day.
Living with the Truth was set in the drab reality that is Jonathan Payne’s life, its sequel is set in the drab reality that is Jonathan’s afterlife. He awakes to find himself inside a landscape entirely generated by his own memories of his past life which means it looks pretty much identical to the seaside town in which he spent his entire and mostly uneventful life.
SHARON: I don’t know what this world’s coming to. That furniture shop in Croydon. Those poor people. How are they going to rebuild their lives? That’s their livelihood gone up in flames. And the flames! The firemen didn’t have a chance of putting it out. Carly’s man’s a fireman. Gorgeous brown eyes. Lucky he don’t work in Croydon. Wouldn’t have wanted to be Carly watching that on telly, worried about her man.
Black Star Co-op’s monthly beer social returns to the backyard of MonkeyWrench Books on Saturday, May 19th. Come out to relax in the backyard, enjoy a pint, and learn more about the Co-op.
wardrobe consultant
While entertaining on a superficial level and as an intellectual exercise in puzzle-solving, "Inception" is a bit of a botch in its lack of any big ideas and, more importantly, emotional payoff. The complexity of entering other peoples' dreams requires possibly the biggest deluge of exposition I have experienced in a film for some time. Nearly every scene in the first half of the film explains and explains and explains, inventing rules and then tossing them aside for newer rules which also get explained again and again. Even during the more action-oriented second half of the movie, the characters provide running commentary, as newer rules get explained. One of the funniest lines is when Ellen Page asks a couple of levels down in the dream world, "Whose subconscious are we entering now?" because even she got lost in all the exposition.
Toss out the doddery old guy and his cardigan. You know in real life grandpas are people, and that means they're as diverse as any other human beings. So approach grandpa as a character, not a cliche.
I love this scene. I may or may not still do it with a few of my Disney friends when we see each other after a long time apart.
Instead of being repulsed by the self-destructive behaviour of others ask them, "How can I help you to heal?"
Please join with me in praying for this family in this time of great loss, as well as thanking God that we do not grieve without hope. Her daughter was a believer, and as such, though we grieve with our friend, we also look forward to that glorious reunion.
Dark Kiss is an early Fall offering, and is currently only available in the 1 oz teaser body lotion. Notes include--and I can't believe I'm actually typing this--sensual incense, mirabelle plum, and night musk. That's right, friends; Bath & Body Works is venturing into incense territory, and I'm hoping it's actually noticeable rather than shrouded in a thick cloud of fruit. My usual Bath & Body Works (in NY) didn't have Dark Kiss yet, but you can get it online, and a couple of early reviewers are saying it's reminiscent of Black Amethyst.
Winner: Cooking Lager - Drop the beer geek act cookie and get back to what you do best. Entertain us!
I've also used the rest of a 75p piece of fabric, an old linen napkin and some crocheted doilies to make some more cushions for the bedroom chairs- the other part of the 75p fabric was used to make the piping for my embroidered bed cushion months ago.
Dusty had a primetime TV show in 1967. In it she had a chance to sing some different syles of songs. I'm sorry Cheryl and the rest of you wannabees, but you don't deserve to be mentioned in the same breath as Dusty.
Wow, that's kinda hard for me. When I was a child, I had attention span difficulties, and people and things didn't make an impression on me. They seemed to just always be “there.” But I do remember sitting on a swing in pre-school and talking to a boy. He could as easily have been an imaginary friend though.
They flower on new wood only, meaning on this year's new growth
We had a good response to our last challenge which was a sketch with a theme of - Christmas in July - although some of you chose not to use the sketch..the creations were still fabulous...so I'm happy to announce that the winner of the Simon Says Stamp prize is....
A little known band from Sweden called Arch Enemy stopped by at Malaysia last week and here is the review of the concert :
Councillor Waters may as well stop wasting his time with this, COYC "Officers" and their equally inept partners North Yorkshire Police have no intention of doing anything proactive about this problem. It wouldn't surprise me at all if they'd all been issued with questionnaire to that goes something like this: 1) Does the animal concerned have distinctive brown and white markings? 2) Was it tethered near suspiciously similar beasts, have these animals been reported to us by several concerned motorists and the RSPCA. 3) Is the animal already in the road and been involved in several near misses? 4) Was the animal tethered near a residence of non-permanent nature populated by people whose identity is a little difficult to ascertain, who may have a rough working knowledge of the law and are able to avoid answering questions placed to them? 5) Is the animal dead or injured having been struck by a moving vehicle? If the answers to any of questions 1-4 are yes if you work for the council tell the caller to ring the RSPCA or police, if you work for the police tell the caller to ring the council, please note there is as yet no defined limit to amount of times a caller may be referred from one partner organisation to the other in these instances. If the answer to question 5 is yes and you work for the council advise the caller to ring the police, if you work for the police immediately dispatch traffic units from their current position outside Mcdonalds at Bilton Top to check the vehicle involved’s tyre tread depth, wipers, insurance, drivers vision, licence and blood alcohol level. On no account are officers to make any effort to locate the owner of the horse once they don’t answer the caravan door. If the answer to any of questions 1-5 is no the animal concerned may be safely in a field, owned by someone who lives in a house and of no real concern to any organisation other than the RSPCA. If you work for the council tell the caller to ring the police, if you work for the police immediately dispatch all available officers in high visibility clothing equipped with luxury 4wd’s and at least two firearms support units, officers are to chase the animals haplessly round fields for at least six hours without the aid of specialist tools such as a 50ft rope strung between two blokes. Once it has been clearly noted that the animals pose no danger and have no access to any road get the firearms boys in to turn them into Pedigree Chum on the grounds you are thick , can’t think of any other solution and control has told you there is no overtime getting paid on this one. So it would seem that there’s a certain reluctance, on the part of the authorities, to act against a defined identity group even when H&S is at risk, and when it could cost them dear in a court case…
So are we forbidden by the Catholic Religion, to say, There be three Gods, or three Lords.
Off to Goodwill I went yesterday for 99 cent day looking for the perfect sweater to cut up and found one! I also found a fantastic men's jacket with these great buttons on it. So, without further ado, here they are! (Elli, YOU might like a pair of these. Got any old sweaters???)
Ronnie McNeir ~ I Just Wanna Dance With You ~ Sunset Island Records ~ 2011
We are almost there - almost...
After all, Fussman begins the article saying: “So it figures that at least some of these single men in love with the Sofia Vergara they see on television will go looking for their own Sofia. And some of them just may find her, in another Latina. They may even marry that other Latina. It’s not a stretch to say that children, perhaps many children, will come into this world because so many American men are falling in love with Sofia Vergara.”
So, in the distant past, total eclipses were much more common. Likewise, in the distant future total eclipses will no longer occur - the Moon's apparent size will just be too small to block out the entire Sun. It's a rather happy circumstance we were all born at a time in Earth's history when the two brightest celestial objects are the same size on the sky.
“The young people are up for grabs, ideologically, and I don’t think either party has figured out how they’re going to handle this libertarian wave,” he said.As I said, fascinating. Hoping some of the disaffected will show up at our Occupy events... hey, we got MOVIES, yall!
This (blurry) photo is from her last visit in April 2011.
“I volunteered for the truck so that I could throw things!”
(6) fact-value dichotomy; and
Jennifer L. Armentrout's novels are like fine wine: They only get better with age. As much as I adored last year's HALF-BLOOD, I love PURE on an even deeper level. First novels in a series are always about world-building: They introduce you to the characters, the major conflicts, the history, etc. They make you fall in love, so when the next novel arrives, it's like coming home after being away for far too long. I didn't realize just how much I missed Alex until I watched her kick butt (and get her butt kicked!) in PURE.
In total, the MPAA is requesting that Carpathia retain and preserve “all material in its possession, custody, or control, including electronic data and database, related to Megaupload or its operations. This would include, but is not limited to, all information identifying or otherwise related to the content files uploaded to, stored on and/or downloaded from Megaupload; all data associated with those content files, the uploading or downloading of those files, and the Megaupload users who uploaded or downloaded those files.”
I stayed awake, waiting for him to wake up, then asked him to drive me home. I wanted nothing to do with Long Island, not ever again.
I think this photo embodies the theme of the shoot, the lighting is soft and strategically placed, and it perfectly displays the rose detail on this backless dress. I love the angle and the pose. This looks like something out of a luxury magazine with an enchanted forest as the setting. Check out some of the other photos submitted by 135FotoGrafiks.
What are you reading? Leave a post below and we will choose one winner at random.
We had the school’s Christmas Fayre last night, at which my role was to look after the kids and take them home while Mrs YtoC helped out. In the end I half volunteered and half got roped in to running one of the games stalls. It was super fun.
nowhere an obstacle or conflict.
Toss all spinach into saucepan with a little water, cover and steam for a few minutes until leaves are wilted and bright green. Once wilted, add crumbled feta and let cook slightly until cheese begins to soften.
By the way, that mylar blanket? Totally disgusting when you're still sweaty and it's humid out. I didn't want it touching me at all. It wasn't until I was standing in line for a massage that I started to shiver uncontrollably and really wanted that thing.
Thor: You people are so petty, and tiny.
These owls occur in both the New and Old Worlds; here’s their range map:
Snowshoeing has many benefits that effect the whole mind, body and spirit. Explore your local parks and trails and experience a new you!
The landlord has filed his own lawsuit, claiming the tenants broke their lease and that the whole “I am Vinz Clortho,The Keymaster” thing is really just a ruse to get out of the contract because the couple is having financial problems and realized they could not afford the rent.
K&Co PP
This week, by bicycle to Abberton Reservoir, a body of water renowned for its flocks of water-fowl. As we watched the swan rose out of the water, wings beating strenuously. We also saw curiously patterned Egyptian ducks.
Morning priorities:
There have also been goals that we didn’t reach. Looking back we realized that sometimes we just aimed too high – or even had too many to fulfill within the timeline we gave ourselves. I tend to be the one who focuses on what we failed to finish but the Mr. does a great job at highlighting our successes and thankfully reminding me to give myself a pat on the back for even the smaller accomplishments…
STEPH: Do you have an eBook reader? If so, which one?
Thanks for looking.
As a political matter, “Things could have been worse, you know” is a far cry from “Hope.” That’s probably why the Obama campaign has settled on the slogan “Forward.” That’s not to say that the counterfactual tactic is unusual in politics — we are, after all, engaging in some serious guesswork — but rarely is the justification for re-election based almost entirely on a gigantic hypothetical. When there is no tangible accomplishment to grab, I guess you’re left with few alternatives.
I get paid
There are a lot of authors out there who say that their characters speak to them while writing, but I don’t really hold to that idea. My characters are mine and I can do what I want with them. Although. My characters don’t speak to me, but what does happen is my brain says, “so-and-so wouldn’t do that. You know that. Stop that right now.” I can’t force my characters to act out of character which means either I need to adjust their character in the beginning to allow them to do some things or I have to deal with the fact that they won’t do something and find a way around it.
Indie Publishing: 7 Mistakes I Won’t Make Again
I have enrolled in a math course, a pre-nursing class and Anatomy/Physiology I!!
And you want to smile, but you have to sigh,
A few signs remained that the tunnels had once seen human use - broken fittings in twisted steel dotted the walls, and in a few places there were still the remains of a crude artificial floor, metal grating wrecked by some effect or other of the Realmcrash. The destruction was too haphazard to have been deliberate, but where had the rest of the wreckage gone? It was unlikely to have been salvaged; any scavenger would have had the hefty doors first.
STATUS: Court of Appeals reversed and remanded for granting of partial summary judgment for Plaintiff on May 1, 2012.
So, those were my adventures in dough this weekend. What should I make next??
Recently some old friends of mine got together and started a new bird rescue center in the Morgantown area. Jesse Fallon, an experienced avian veterinarian and his wife Katie Fallon, author of Cerulean Blues, A Personal Search for a Vanishing Songbird (http://ceruleanblues.wordpress.com/) founded the Avian Conservation Center of Appalachia. With an immense amount of support from other volunteers and professionals, the ACCA has a bright future. At one of the first organizational meetings, when each person introduced themselves, most people added the qualifying line “…and I like birds!”. The organization is focusing on rehabilitation, education and research in the form of citizen science.
One of my favorite verses is Romans 8:28, “And we know that for those who love God all things work together for good, for those who are called according to his purpose.”
The girls love the cows. Anything with spots, including the neighbors horses, are called Holly Moo. That's how it is in their world. Maybe now that we have a couple of brown cows it will change? Who knows.
During the 2010 and 2011 summers, I was a cashier at Wal-Mart #1788 in Scarborough, Maine. I spent hours upon hours toiling away at a register, scanning, bagging, and dealing with questionable clientele. These were all expected parts of the job, and I was okay with it. What I didn’t expect to be part of my job at Wal-Mart was to witness massive amounts of welfare fraud and abuse.
08. Fast Track 1
Vermont History Expo ~ Tunbridge Fairgrounds, Tunbridge, VT ~ June 16-17
Especially we should read regularly through the Scriptures, consecutively, and not pick out here and there a chapter. If we do, we remain spiritual dwarfs.
In between writing e-mails to the Kelzsyn's Bluff & Environs project team members, re-writing the Players' Manual, reading your blogs, and having a life away from the computer, I have completed everything but the equipping and 'hook' for the ten pre-generated characters for the product.
First we had Meir Dagan, former head of the Mossad, emerging from the shadows and in terribly un-statesmanelike manner announcing to the world that for Israel to bomb Iran would be the stupidest idea ever.
Back by popular demand! We start again in May 1st.
Before you get a snuggly toy to help them sleep, make sure it’s not demonically possessed. Because watching it creep across the baby monitor may cause you to lose the ability to sleep again, ever.
1. Planning ahead--for the next morning/training--and also for the next week and month.
If you’re having a hard time grasping that God wants you to have
Day 2, pioneer day celebration with Tom and Jeannie. The girls were thrilled to receive a little coin purse to hold their pennies they earned to get some candies at the end of the festivities. They liked sawing wood, panning for gold and playing some old simple games....like throwing a ball at old milk bottles.
I also started working on blocks for the Farmer's Wife Quilt Along and I'm having so much fun! I'm late to the party considering that most have been working on their blocks for a year but I figure better late than never! And if you check out the Flickr group or Amanda or Angela's blogs you'll be as inspired as I have been! There's some really amazing blocks out there. I'm piecing my by hand so this will be a very long term project but it's so nice to slow down a bit and take my time with something. It's also way easier to be accurate doing these by hand!
... Well yes we do have it bad, but it seems Scotland has it much worse.
I was still sitting on a plastic chair, Eric snoring at 11.45 when the surgeon asked me to come out in the corridor as he wanted a word. You can imagine how I was feeling..."Gowd he's sending me home". He was so nice....fit as well.. ( a Greek hunk of a man ) lol. He told me he'd found me a posh bed - on the private ward and a nurse would come down and fetch me shortly.
Screw them.
What do I love to create?
They spend HOURS out there... HOURS... in a lopsided pool... eyeballing to see if it is level? It doesn't work...
The SWP’s Racist and Neo-Colonialist Posh Boys
Really, girlfriend that’s all you got? By my count that is somewhere around a dozen guys. I think there are over 3 billion men alive today. Someone a lot smarter than I am would have to calculate how many men have been alive since the Bible was written, as you are going after not just guys today but dead guys too back to the beginning of time.
I thought I couldn’t write good characters. Most books on writing (and many authors) say that a writer has to feel what her characters feel or else the reader won’t feel the characters’ emotions. If you don’t cry, neither will your reader. But I don’t feel what my characters feel. Writing erases emotion, takes me to a place of serenity. And serenity is not generally where you want to take a reader. But I am deliberate in my choice of words and in the details I include. Perhaps those elements combine to help overcome my lack of emotion.
That’s it. Due to family over for Easter meal, I have no more time today. Enjoy your Easter Sunday.
yeah, once a drunk guy offered up his harley in exchange for you,
Configure and manage database maintenance plans to ensure a trouble free environment.
At least Patterly followed the lead of his creations and was never seen or heard from ever again after this. See; justice is still served in this world.
You have over a week to get your entries in.
-NTC is not running the mills, and therefore the entire NTC land should be wholly used for the public benefit, for the people of Mumbai, and not for private gain.
(In truth, when I showed my husband the closet, he said, "So THIS is the answer to all our problems, huh?!", in a totally sarcastic, snarky way. But, inside I know his heart was palpitating with excitement and in awe of my skills. I could just tell).
18. Blue Lester
Maynooth
Bottom line: Like most adaptations of The Vicomte de Bragelonne, this film takes the minor subplot of the man in the iron mask and runs with it—but stays remarkably true to the characters we know and love from The Three Musketeers. The cast is great, especially Jeremy Irons as Aramis, Leonardo DiCaprio as both King Louis and the Man in the Iron Mask, and, briefly, Peter Sarsgaard as John Malkovitch’s son, the swordfights are thrilling, and the costumes are gorgeous. Great fun.
A fitter, healthier, skinnier body; more willpower; a more organized house so I'm comfortable having people over.
Wouldn’t community service and some rehab or therapy have made a lot more sense? Or maybe a week in jail? We’ve got to change these laws. If anyone is more versed than me in how we go about this, tell all. – Lenore
It felt like we were just getting settled when my youngest fell and broke her jaw and our world was rocked again. By the grace of God, she avoided having her jaw wired shut but we still endured six weeks of a blended diet with a three year old (not to mention the corneal abrasion she suffered post-operatively).
In that I was rebellious to his law,
“No one can serve two masters. For you will hate one and love the other; you will be devoted to one and despise the other. You cannot serve both God and money.” (Matthew 6:24)
It seems like only yesterday that we were packing up Momma to be and getting to the hospital to be a part of this new adventure ....... being grandparents.
Wow, we had a really great crowd with challenging suggestions for the game ‘voice mail,’ and really great sets overall.
Much better that they have the opportunity to see the sights of the palace than me. I can always come back.
Hi Friends!!!
On another occasion, I had to prefect the library during a period. Two students in my senior philosophy class were working on an assignment I had given them on the philosopher Descartes. With both horror and bemusement, I watched them pull up a .pdf of Descartes's text and "Control-F" to find all instances of a particular phrase. Not knowing I was standing behind them, one said to the other that, "...if we use a lot of quotes, he won't know we didn't read the text." Poor little lambs...
You look for a couple things.
We came home to eat lunch and cook the family a chicken pot pie and some Oreo cream cheese cookies (YUM!).
When: Wednesday, July 15, 12:30PM
When I saw this I thought "Well, I could always have a swing in the trees, I have a lot of those." So if I do not get my porch swing this summer perhaps I can talk my husband into one of these.....at the very least I will get one of these!
The report also found that there are certain lifestyle changes that will reduce your risk of getting cancer. Some of the health benefits of organic foods is below:
Official time was 1hr 25mins 27seconds. 23,747th place, not bad for a round man with only 6 months “training”.
Though you can't say if you'll arrive
“The C-Section scar is Bloor Street, the long line to the left is University Avenue and this line over here is Bay Street. Oh this line, see how it gets thinner here, yea, that’s Yonge Street in rush hour!” Hey, you have to laugh at yourself sometimes.
CHICAGO (August 31, 2011) — Lawyers in Seyfarth Shaw LLP’s Intellectual Property practice, Mike Levinson, Joe Lanser and Matt Werber, successfully obtained a summary judgment of non-infringement on behalf of our client, Home Shopping Network (HSN).
I still had a bunch of radishes left from a previous pickup; I have to admit, I am not a big fan of radishes. They're too peppery for me! So I thought cooking them would help and I found this recipe for braised radishes over at The Kitchn. Oh boy! They don't look as pretty, but gosh are they delicious. I substituted some waxed Chinese bacon for the salt pork, which was a stroke of genius on my part, if I do say so myself. I hope I get more radishes next week.
I decided to garnish the turkey chili with avocado and sour cream.
How do you come back from the point of no return?
This incident occurred on Wednesday, 13 May at one of the shacks in the squatter camp New Stand, Thabong township, near the gold-mining town of Welkom in the Free State Province of South Africa.
I have been in a position where I’ve had to choose between milk and medicine. Where I’ve often decided not to get my pills as I couldn’t afford them. And of course this is not conducive to a good health regime. With Project 2016 I am supposed to work towards mens sana in corpore sano – a healthy mind in a healthy body – and this is one step in that direction. As of today, I will always be able to get my pills when I need them. The monthly instalments will be taken from my new Cash Plus card. That gives me a double bonus. One because having direct debits – and money in the account to pay for them! – helps building a positive credit record. And two because this gives me another incentive to keep working for an extra income so that there will be enough money on my card.
You love any activity that involves lots of fine motor control: puzzles, shape sorting, block stacking, bead threading. You also love trains. Like, whoa, with the trains. We have a wooden train set and you adore putting the track pieces together to make bridges, then swooshing your three linked train cars down the bridge incline. You like cars a little, but trains are your first love.
that flocked the sand and made the meadows glow.
Protests have been called for the 28th against an expo being put on by the Defence Industry to pimp their explosives to a series of international partners. Adelaide Indymedia has published this background info for those interested:
“Charon spent Christmas drinking Italian reds, listening to Verdi and Puccini, and amusing himself on Twitter and Skype video. He had, he told me, been dreaming of a White Christmas but it was not to be. He couldn’t explain why he painted himself, based on a well known painting by Picasso, dressed in blue underpants and a vest – because he doesn’t have any blue underpants or vests. He does, however, have red wine, rather a lot of it, and red and green feature strongly in his main ’studio’. I noted the use of a knife in covering a fair part of this canvas with paint. Charon told me that he liked to use knives while painting… they did the business.”
I started calling it the Triangle Circle Quilt...but while descriptive, that's boring. UBG reminds me of the BFG, at least. Which reminds me that I need to start reading Roald Dahl books to the Dude. He was vastly impressed with my Bunnicula books, so I think he'd like Dahl.
He then presents the following chart showing an estimated cost of federal regulations at a whopping $1.75 Trillion - a startling 12% of GDP!
So the Rural Metro paramedic gets hostile all over me. I’m trying to help the patient, which RM Para isn’t; he’s just trying to block me, so he calls his partner over. His partner has been talking to the building manager, not the patient. His partner is an enormous man who towers over me in my wheelchair. (Dave Butler at TLC, by the way, trains his people that when they are talking to a person in a wheelchair, they are to drop down on one knee so they are at the patient’s eyelevel. This may seem a small thing, but why don’t you spend the rest of today sitting down whenever somebody wants to talk to you? You have very little effect on what happens to you when you are in the one-down position.)
She knelt
This tile represents Frying Pan Alley, a tiny and now unremarkable little passageway that runs between Bell Lane and Middlesex Street in Spitalfields. A tiny alley with a fantastic name. Nowadays entirely developed, and, as a result, somewhat charmless. But early photographs of the area reveal a most intriguing and atmospheric little street...
"Homebrewers should not be viewed in the same light as the bathtub gin makers, moonshiners and swill brewers from Prohibition, nor are they running speakeasies out of their homes," says state Sen. Joseph Vitale of Middlesex County, home of the WHALES homebrew club. "Today's homebrewers and winemakers take up the hobby to produce a product for their own enjoyment and which they can share with their families. Getting rid of this permit requirement is the right thing to do."
14 - medallions - behind the door
I hope in the busyness of this season we are able to enjoy the pure beauty of our shared humanity in our family, friends and worship.
and remember what peace there may be in silence.
What I love about Benjamin is his ability for not taking life too seriously. He would burn the midnight oil by typing his essays the night before the deadline. There were days when he was still in bed when I arrived back to my room after a series of lectures which I dutifully attended.
Kaluarachi insisted that that his crew had only gone to cover the stalls being removed when they were harassed and the visuals were later deleted by force.
From the creator of Sonic, a little game about a kiwi who needs to find it’s mother. When I say it’s a little game, it’s a very little game. It lasts about two-three hours, but the time it lasts is fun.
Sunday - Easter Sunday. I had originally planned on taking Easter off running, but we went to the 7 a.m. church service and there were a lot of hours between that and going to my parents' later in the afternoon. So after a leisurely breakfast and watching Rod go up on his roof to clean it, I headed out for an easy run. I planned to do about eight, but ended up with 9.3, average pace about 9:45.
This came out of the head of my personal Gooner Daily assistant and brother from another mother
First, you’ll get a friendly email asking you to confirm your totally free subscription. After that, you will get an email notification whenever I post a new article. Don’t worry; should you decide that you don’t wish to receive any more notifications, there is an unsubscribe link with every email. But I guarantee you won’t want to miss a single one! Thanks for signing up!
2 surroundings
I feel better now. Thanks for indulging me.
They have access to too much information. That’s the problem with young people today.
I was angry, but I wasn't sure why.
printing these tickets.
We need to talk. On behalf of men everywhere, there’s something I’d like to get off my (impossibly fresh-smelling) chest: Chick flicks are screwing with your expectations of guys. Even my irresistibly charming Old Spice commercials raise the bar. Just because your guys doesn’t offer you diamonds and puppies and beachside serenades like the Man your Man could smell like, it doesn’t mean he isn’t crazy about you.
Owing to the wonders of the UK National Health Service, my hearing aids and batteries are free. ‘Going private’, though, for a rather less visible ‘in-ear’ pair will cost upward of £2500. I wonder what the manufacturing cost is – I have seen estimates of $100. I am astonished that an iPod with substantially more features will be on sale for 10 or more times less. I can only assume the hearing assistance industry thinks that compensating for human anxiety and sense of loss is an opportunity to make large profits. I can see that a personal and professional service, particularly outside an intimidating hospital setting, is reassuring and helpful, but I feel sorry for those who have (rather than choose) to pay this amount. As the enormous cohort of mobile phone users gradually shifts into the ‘seniors’ demographic we may perhaps find major digital products manufacturers will make hearing-assistive devices for them, and prices will fall. There are plenty of technical opportunities for convergence with smartphones; even now, in a not particularly technologically advanced market, if I spend £140 on a bluetooth device I can play music from my phone or receive calls direct into my hearing aids. But the sound system on many newish cars can connect, cable-free and with minimal set-up, with smartphones. Perhaps the numbers of bluetooth-aware deaf people and the comparatively slow turnover of devices doesn’t justify the design costs – but then high prices and minimal upgrades of technical features are bound to slow down the rate of device replacement.
Then the Chinese meaning is longevity. I like this one. Some other characteristics are warmth, nourishment and some negative meanings are haughtiness, false appearances and unhappy love. Great...now I'm just confused again.
This beautiful châteaux remains a popular French tourist attraction, and is celebrated as marking the transition from the earlier Rococo style of architecture into the neoclassical form which became popular in the middle to late 18th Century. By all accounts the young queen fell in love with Le Petit Trianon, and set about transforming it into her own fantasy world.
Do you have seagulls at your school? Enough of them hang around our school that one might think we were seaside...don't we wish? While we do not have a lovely ocean view, we are near enough to inlets off of the Puget Sound and to the Hood Canal that numerous seagulls find it worth the short flight to hang around the playground in hopes of nabbing dropped crackers. Today however, one particularly pesky seagull managed to nab an entire sack lunch. Our students have recess before lunch and so take their lunches outside with them (placing them in bins until the whistle blows). The gutsy gull picked up a full paper sack out of the lunch bin and took it up to the roof. My little kindergarten buddy could only stand there and watch as his lunch flew away. Poor guy had to settle for a bean burrito hot lunch. When I asked him what had happened to his lunch later, his response was a simple..."a bird stoled it."
Burridge went down fighting at home to White Horse on Saturday afternoon. Unfortunately, it was done amongst themselves.
I miss you! I do miss you indeed!
I really think that it's up to the makers of these ads to pull out the stops and make a better case against piracy. The ads should lay it out clearly and distinctly because it's an argument that, I think, is persuasive in its own right.
i don't like to cry in front of strangers in offices & in the parking garage.
But, was Ritchie always successful in his attempt to stop suicides?
Seriously, what am I going to do? It was my sarcasm tune-up for the day. It made me ready for my fourth grade students. And all that will change. I will probably become a very boring teacher now. I won’t be able to roll my eyes effectively when I get a strange answer from them. Seriously, what the hell am I going to do?
his Byzantine imagery. In 1904,
Now, I'm not one to be negative, as most people know, but I was truly upset about this, and I think sometimes its important to recognize when negative thoughts creep up. It's important to let yourself feel down sometimes, because if you didn't, you'd go crazy. For me, once I'm able to be honest with myself about what I'm feeling, I'm able to learn something from it and turn it into a positive, or at least make it something that isn't going to ruin my day.
"I'm from Dublin too! Let's have another drink to Dublin."
we worked with burlap
-$0.50/1 Band-Aid Adhesive Bandage, (SS 07/31/11)
Morton spent the 1970 season playing in Japan.
Although there are elements of truth in each description, both sides are guilty of failing to break free of their political bias to provide their respective audiences the unadulterated truth about the occupy operation. As a result, unnecessary polarization among Americans is heightened by their words and writings, many who could relate to the injustices but had little sympathy for those who are denied justice. In some cases, the political pundits have become unwitting participants of the growing social divide, playing directly into the hands of the operation’s architects. In other cases, they are willful facilitators working with them.
Why, you ask? Because my children wear the rattiest, most mismatched shit to sleep in you have ever laid eyes on. Comfy? Absolutely. Presentable to wear in public? Hell to the no! I have 3 girls, so pajamas are handed down and worn completely thread bare. Even MY pajamas are pathetic looking. Because nobody is actually supposed to see them. And I am horrified by the thought of my sweet angels being judged by their attire, and talked about in hushed tones by all the kiddos who probably have brand spanking new pj’s on tomorrow. Call me vain. Whatever. Kids are cruel. I know it, and so do you.
and called You're My Type.
We must remind ourselves that we are doing the most important work in this nation, bringing up the next generation to take their place responsibly and soberly in the difficult social and environmental landscape we must confront together.
very long time
1. The bible tells us that we are made in the image of God. “So God created man in his own image, in the image of God he created him; male and female he created them” ~ Genesis 1:27
So, another week has gone, and the playground is open again - Mr Linky is below. I've missed commenting immediately on your entries a couple of times this week, sorry and I hope I've caught up OK, bit of tail-chasing been going on here!
My friend Carol came to hear me play and took the photo above during a break in the snowflake balloon fencing action. I hadn't put the event on my website and was pleasantly surprised to see her there. "I stalked you," she said when I asked her how she found out about the event. Really, she'd seen a poster for the event in Mankato. We had a good laugh together...but I'm sure I'll be looking over my shoulder for Carol at future unpublicized events...just in case...
Want to see some amazing stuff? Google "Nail Art photos".
On that day, 70 years ago, everyone saw the truth in the statement, 'Together we are powerful!'
For more ideas for kid's rooms, I recommend these two
The Commander of The Alamo, William Travis quickly assembled his men. He told them that no reinforcements were coming. “Our doom is certain,” Travis told the tired, beaten men. Then, Travis pulled his sword from its sheath and drew a line in the dirt. He asked every man who was committed to remain in the Alamo, fight and die to cross the line.
Martin doesn't seem to be much of one for happy reunions or easy solutions, so things generally get more complicated for all our characters as the book progresses instead of easing up. But we wouldn't have it any other way, George!
And no, this is not an invitation to email through your favourite offal recipes. As adventurous as I like to believe my palate is, I'm happy to stay in the dark on this one.
Today’s assignment is sweet.
2,4-D is one of the top selling pesticides in the United States and is widely used in residential, commercial, and agriculture.
Since the 'spending money' budget hasn't had much room for buying new clothes lately (maybe I shouldn't buy lunch all the time at work...) I've been doing a lot of mixing and matching what I already have.
To create a focal point when you enter the room, I started by painting one wall a dark navy (Stunning by Benjamin Moore). I wanted to keep the room neutral overall, but went for a strong punch of pattern on the floor by using Pottery Barn's chain link rug (which I was also able to score at one of their outlets).
Dodgy Good enough UK
74.733132, -94.932071
1. It gave me a starting point to drop all the crap and unfinished projects out of my life.
“He’s somewhere around here, Carl. I trailed him from the apartment to the bus and on into this building. We’ll find him, just be alert.”
Yes, yes sure. Let's all resign from our jobs and still get paid.
Hama is the key to the fight between the regime and the opposition. The Baathist Regime (which came to power in 1963 based on the tiny Alawite Shia sect) blames all opposition to its rule on the large Sunni majority and radical Islamicists rather than working class opposition to a ruling class dictatorship. The brutal suppression of the Sunni rebellion in Hama in 1982 with 20,000 killed (Robert Fisk’s estimate) proves that the regime only retains power by a dictatorship and cannot be brought down peacefully. Though there are still liberal academics who say that if Assad purges his regime of those responsible for the killings of 1982, and today, then a negotiated settlement is possible.
have become the symbolic flags around which those most intensely concerned with linguistic purity (whatever that may be) have tacitly agreed to rally. None of these “errors” interferes with clarity and concision; indeed, some of them let us save a word or two.
Too many moments to capture like this one.....
I also stopped eating pork. My fingers started to peel again. They had been peel-free for two weeks. Then, I started eating sausage like it was going out of style. I love pork and was so thrilled that my butcher could make a sugar-free pork sausage. I did some more online research and found that pork and psoriasis can go hand-in-hand. I stopped eating it 6 days ago and the peeling is not getting worse. It's fading away.
See related documents: Attorney-General’s Department. Investor-State Arbitration – Tobacco Plain Packaging. Canberra: Australian Government, 2011
Well, I’ve already mentioned Icarus and Orpheus…Pandora’s another one. I seem to like these stories involving irresistible temptations, so this probably indicates I have no willpower whatsoever. But I have to come back to the story of Orpheus and Eurydice, I think, for the tale that probably has it all for me. Orpheus himself is irresistible, and anything involving the underworld holds a particular fascination; so much more interesting than Olympus! I love everything about it; Cerberus the three-headed dog guarding the entrance, the ferryman Charon, the stories of penitents like Sisyphus and Tantalus and their eternal tasks. I love the story of Demeter and Persephone too, the six seeds of the pomegranate, how it relates to the seasons…but no, I can only have one, so I’ll stick with Orpheus and Eurydice.
Today I'm loving pretty details :-
in youth
A lady in street and what is done behind closed doors is no one’s concern.
Lady Gaga's "Bad Romance" video takes up many of the same concerns with femininity that Aase Berg does in With Deer, albeit using a much different stream of images, and Lara Glenum's Action Yes! piece on girly kitsch presents a great starting point for making some of these connections.
"Boutros-Ghali sent his emissaries today to express their horror.
In 2009, Brookside Properties began a remodel of the Hillsboro Plaza, requiring all of its tenants to update their signage. Hoping to create a more modern and uniform look, the quirky sign was removed by the property owners with no intentions of being returned. Fans of the beloved Donut Den were dismayed, and demanded the return of the neon landmark. A great loss was felt at the sign’s removal. Many believed the character of the area, which was in low supply to begin with, would be greatly affected if the iconic “dancing” letters were replaced with a static piece of painted fiberglass.
On second thought-
After buying the Nook, I didn't want to spend more money on a cover for it. I did a quick google search and found this pattern for a crochet Nook cover. I just used leftover yarn, and it was very quick to stitch. The pattern calls for buttons to secure the cover flap in place, but I left the buttons off because I didn't want to mess with them. Now when I'm done reading, I just fold the cover around the Nook like an envelope. Very easy.
Tor.com has posted an interview with Edward Einhorn, the director of the stage adaptation of Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep? currently running in New York City. In a recent post I may have hinted that the producers of this were on a different page, what with the mock 'Save the Androids Fundraiser', but even a cursory glance at this interview reveals that Einhorn has zeroed in on the book's central theme. Here's an important excerpt:
- June - Land and Environment court rejects current DA by Glenndining, Minto and Associates
Executives face a crackdown on the taxing of their golden handshakes and living away from home allowances. And the new financial year will see the means-testing of the private health insurance rebate for singles on more than $83,000 a year and families on more that $166,000.
Words: Fan­ny Cros­by
Big things are happening over the next few weeks (and hopefully months).
I killed the fire at last
Some other goodies that are up for grabs (these are in no particular order and have been donated by my generous co-hosts for this event!):
Svali reveals that the main incentive to advance in this group is that as you reach higher levels, you are no longer required to hurt as many people, and fewer people are permitted to hurt you.
see that salad?
"Dude, I don't hate you! If the truth is out there, the truth must be spoken."
Takes all you got just to stay on the beat
I'm one of those people who hate to wear sunscreen because they often smell strongly, are thick, take forever to fully blend in and they feel gross after awhile. However, the Supergoop! brand makes fantastic products, and I really liked their Everyday Face & Body Moisturizer SPF 30.
Hence I needed to get out to Moscow. I contacted a travel agency who did tailor-made tours. The owner, Alan Steel, proved to be invaluable. He told me a lot about the city before I went, so I made sure I visited not just the places I knew about, but also some I didn’t, and I got a real, gritty flavour of Moscow, away from the tourist traps.
Some cute things he has done recently:
In a breath I began to run.
I cut through the center and gingerly try a bite.
I haven't had one of these in a long time. I should go find someone who would be willing to purchase these for my use.
Precision: 5.1 megapixel
Brookings is an odd place. It’s a village/town/sprawl along the 101 highway close to the Californian border which is just somewhere to pass through on the way to somewhere nicer, really. We stopped there as there was nowhere else we could make it to as it was getting late. We visited one of the local taverns, Ken’s, and it really was a local’s tavern. A man was throwing coins at the barmaid as we walked in, but she seemed to take it in her stride. We drank some more of the lovely Mirror Pond Pale Ale – nice to see it on draft there – and made a hasty retreat. But I did quite like it there, it was like a bar you’d see in American movies, dark and dingy and had pool tables. Not that I play pool.
What do ghosts hunger for?
Khavu is 14 years old and has passed her Selenoren this year. During the summer there was the yearly Rising Festival where she completed the third Selenor and became adult in the eyes of the clan. Her clan is Soli, same as Khuure’s was.
Hungary came up over lunch. When the time came for me to do something, Hungarian coffee suddenly seemed like a wonderful idea.
I just wanted you to see
The war goes on, and the day comes when Schindler witnesses a ghetto liquidation. This changes his view on the war and the camps springing up all over Germany. Riding a fine horse, Schindler stops atop a hill over-looking the chaos, and his eye falls upon a child in a red coat, who runs through the bodies littering the streets below. Schindler falls sideways from his saddle and, propped up against a tree, weeps.
Next I unearth the truffle, that the collective noun is a ‘venue’ of vultures. If only I had one such to be at for an appointed time. Whisking me out of here, so that I might further dawdle in meandering my way to the destination. Oh for a bannered headline limned into the diary template. But I am not consequential enough to merit a coloured tag all to myself. Bereft of any meeting for my line manager to sign off on my behalf. For their name to give me body.
But not everything needs to be shown, okay??
It could just be me. Do other Tinies have knee-envy? Loco Poco Tinies had separate hands, and Grendel’s Tinies have fully articulated arms — did this really improve their quality of life? (Actually, it made it kinda a nightmare to create holdable attachments for them, but with the new ‘add as many attachments to one point as you want’ feature, that’s no longer a concern.)
Some might say nothing has changed.
trying to name the riptide
I don’t know how I get so lost in thought.
Looks like I've "commented" enough here....these spaces really do speak for themselves. If you're reading this, and have photos/links to other classy and wonderful transformations that are out there, please send them my way. Even though I love new things (doesn't everyone ;)), I'm so inspired by people who can work with what they have and make it beautiful.
Campbell’s alleged association with Najib, however, looks certain to raise as many eyebrows in the UK as in Malaysia.
The problem to answering this is multi-fold, in that we don't have enough real information about al Qaeda to make that pronouncement. Until recently, that is.
Gravity testing on the brew starts now. Then on to moving it from one fermenter to another. Aren't you glad I updated you all on that? I am sure.
There’s nothing like attaching an elastic cord to your feet and jumping off a bridge head-first. Stare death in the face as you see the ground coming closer and closer to you, until you finally feel the relief of slowing down as the elastic cord stretches to its maximum and pulling you back up.
1 permanently
There are those closer to the top of the organisation who have a very fuzzy hole ridden argument about why the new wave of keg beer should not be credenced:-
But society is changeless;
This tutorial is for my everyday eye make-up style. As a classic lolita, I try to acheive a look that is natural but still doll-like, emphasising big eyes. I use black winged eyeliner, neutral eyeshadow and occasionally half lashes. Mine are from Daiso- cheap but effective!
Level 14: MP Cost: 30, Damage: 246%, Attacks up to 6 enemies 3 times, 14% chance to stun the enemy for 3 seconds.
I hit up the Farmers Market Saturday and got all sorts of great veggies. I love the Farmers Market in a major way. My main problem is narrowing down what I really want to buy. I have to only bring a set amount of cash otherwise I would go crazy!
Saterday (March 10)--- That was the day my sister got married! XD We got at the church at like 11am to get ready and we were doing the brides hair 20 minites before it started.But it went very well and i'm very happy for my sister.
That rocky zone
At her grandmother's request, Abbie volunteers at Whitechapel Hospital, where she discovers a passion for helping the unfortunate women and children there. But within days, female patients begin turning up brutally murdered at the hands of Jack the Ripper.
For the first few days, I felt lost, no checking e-mails, or reading favorite blogs, it's a strange feeling of the world moving on without you.
I have always encouraged X to do better in his classes. I have also taken him to school when he's missed his bus, so that he isn't inclined to say "screw it" and ditch. I also really believe that X does try in school. He does put forth an effort, it's just not the way that you'd like it to be. His effort involves simply being there, in a place he hates, every day. Imagine for a moment that you had a job that you hated and yet you couldn't leave for years, a place where people were mean to you, stole things from you, and treated you as someone inferior. All of those things happen to X in school.
CD Baby recommends your music to fans of Bob Dylan, Nick Drake and Tom Waits. However, your latest release, thOUGH the Light seem SMALL (am I getting the cases correct here?), reveals other, less-obvious influences. I'll go out on a limb and suggest Syd Barrett, early Milhaud, Peter Perrett, Dr. Strangely Strange, Van Dyke Parks and The Plugz. How wrong am I?
Even though you have more on your plate as a manager, you can slice some of those extra hours in half by adopting time-saving strategies. Here are a few ideas to tailor time management approaches to your work style:
Rebecca Terschak
Let us never forget that the Kama Sutra was originally intended to provide “advice for a courtly gentleman on how to live a well-rounded life”. As Hef will shortly learn, there’s more to being well-rounded that imitating an anus.
The drummers claim that the finance working group even levied a percussion tax of sorts, taking up to half of the $150-300 a day that the drum circle was receiving in tips. “Now they have over $500,000 from all sorts of places,” said Engelerdt. “We’re like, what’s going on here? They’re like the banks we’re protesting.”
The fucked up truth
I have a gallon of this beautifully subtle dove gray paint. I picked it up at the mistint counter at Home Depot for $5 and I’ve gotten so much use out of it. It’s a Behr Exterior Enamel, and it’s super durable! I love using exterior paints on furniture for it’s durability.
Me, my grandfather, and Emi.
though your horse
For I am convinced that neither death, nor life, nor angels, nor rulers, nor things present, nor things to come, nor powers, nor height, nor depth, nor anything else in all creation, will be able to separate us from the love of God (in Christ Jesus our Lord.)
This is to warn you that you will encounter some scenes that were shot in the bathtub, and some readers may find the following discussion shocking! Proceed at your own risk.
“If you've written a book that's worth reading and you want to see your book in print, get in touch. We accept books of all and every genre. We don't aim to make money, either for ourselves or for our authors, but we do aim to raise funds for a nominated charity with each of our titles. Maybe you'd like to suggest which cause you'd like to benefit from sales of your book?
We believe the Bible does not condemn polygamy (Genesis 16:1-3), even though it is illegal in the USA (Romans 13:1).
My prayer today:
Thank you, kind and sweet anonymous Friend. If you read my blog, I hope you now know how much your gift means to me. I have humbly learned that love and kindness are still out there in the world. Since I can’t thank you in person, I am shouting out my gratitude to the world in hopes of it reaching you. And since I can’t pay you back, I will pay it forward.
Running running running ha ha ha I’m having so much fun, running, I love it, I love this! Yo! Runmothafucka! Running, running, running, runn—
Starting yesterday I had that restless out of the kitchen feeling that I get. Imagine anxiety coupled with deep paranoia and guilt. It's fucked and it sounds psychotic. Maybe it is. I should feel lucky. There are friends to see. I've been given countless lists of places to go to from people I like and respect.
Icing
c) a Greek freedman
yet with 75% of the day gone I'm just getting it up... ; )
I'm supposed to write a one sentence pitch (which I would love some help with!) and post my first paragraph. Lots of you will have seen this before when I posted it a few months back, but for those of you it's new to, feel free to share your thoughts!
I decided to make chicken and gnocci soup. I'd found potato gnocci at the Dollar Tree, and had left over whole milk and half and half from the ice cream in the fridge, so a creamy soup was PERFECT! Too bad it took FOREVER to cook - hehe.
HH73 Mark Teixeira
I think I ovulated. I think I actually felt it this time on Saturday afternoon - weird! I'm totally over in-tune with my body. No OHSS signs so far, so that's good. I guess we will see next week.
- A new one PA (Wayne County)
I don't have any pictures of my work that is still hanging, but I did take the time to make myself a few things.
The Ari z”l himself instituted the inclusion of Psalm 67 and the Ana Bekoach into the daily prayers and when performing special mitzvot. However, the method that was related from the Ari z”l through his disciple Rabbi Chaim Vital in how to recite these prayers was presenting in very detailed kavannot (focused mediation) that were very complicated and involved. Psalm 67 is a great example, because the method most often used to meditation on this verse was not to just read the text, but instead to imagine the 49 words being a 7 branched menorah, with each of the 7 branches containing a verse of the Psalm. Each of the branches relates to one of the 7 sefirot that are active in the physical world, just as with each of the 7 lines of the Ana Bekoach does as well.
The four Mod dogs raised their paws and high fived each other!
chosen by God
These are my three favorite songs that promote curves and their lusciousness. Perfect for if you’re feeling less-than-adequate about your curves, your lumps, your bumps, and the size of your butt! I have these songs on my iPod and I use them as my “pump up” songs for when I’m going somewhere that I know I am going to self conscious at.
So, back then the Sunday School picnic was exciting and added novelty and pleasure to the summer. It was one of the most important events of the season for us.
Someone who claims to believe in God, but not religion, obviously believes that faith in any deity will get the job done.
Let’s get to the main story line here. Last night, I was incredibly bored, so after planting a few rows of potaters out in the old garden and doing a few pages of the old Algebra homework, I decided to make beautifluffle plans with fantastic people. Well, you wouldn’t consider them fantastic, just me. Just I think they’re cool cats.
Today is Autism Awareness Day and son C, who has an autism spectrum disorder, is vehemently opposed to the entire concept. He explained why very eloquently on his Facebook page, and I won't copy and paste his words here, but I will say he gave me a lot to think about.
I have to say when I tried this product I was super disappointed. I do not see what all the hype is about. Two Faced Shadow Insurance did absolutely nothing to help my shadow stay on. Here are the cons:
Production Info: Republic Pictures (USA), 1938
Interested in Bible study? Want to hear a little bit about some of the latest studies from the mouth of your favorite authors? Then join in on the Bible study expo. On May 17th from 1 - 5 you can listen to 15 minute interviews all online with each author explaining the story behind each study.
Give space when going downhill
Speaking of surprises, I’ve been eyeing this multi-layer rainbow cake I found on foodgawker foreverrrrrr! I finally got the excuse to bake it up today for my sister’s party. It was so funny because all the party guests did not know what to expect when I told them there was a surprise for them inside the cake. I mean, it looks like a totally normal cake from outside, with the plain white icing and what not. They probably thought that I put some strange material inside. Surprise!!!!! They had no idea that there would be a rainbow inside after the first slice was cut.
But great moments often catch us unaware-beautifully wrapped in what others may consider a small one.
Where did you go? Where did you go?
I tell him I want to look like Jane Fonda. (Jane Fonda now, that is, with her discreet sophistication, not in her bouffant and glamorous Barbarella days. Although this is a secret dream I am loathe to give up.) Paul, I can tell, is doubtful, and summons every ounce of tact he has to suggest that perhaps the Jane Fonda look is not for me and actually just a couple of inches off the Fringe would be fine. Of course, he’s right. It is fine. Apart from anything else, I can actually see again and should now stop bumping into the furniture and wandering off the kerb by mistake. In theory, that is.
Universal: Will work on both iPad and iPhone
This act of desperation by Arrowcroft appears to be a last ditched attempt to plug holes in their case.
A loss in Michigan and the general lack of enthusiasm would mean an end to the Romney campaign. He’d stay in as he DOES have the money and organization but the State’s going into the loss column will greatly out number the winning States.
It seems as if this year we are getting plenty of winter. So, if you want to figure out how to describe a winter scene, don’t think of this a terrible winter but as a marvelous opportunity for learning how to describe a winter scene. The secret is to find the telling details — the sights, sounds, smell, feel, taste that evoke the entire feeling of the season. Even better is to find that which only you can experience. Icicles dripping from the eaves have been described a zillion times. (A slight exaggeration, but you get the point.) The crystalline aspect of ice-covered trees has probably been described as often. And so has that childhood horror of getting one’s tongue stuck to metal. But what about shadows on the snow? Rats. That’s been done, too.
No-one in the SanGreal Chronicles casts as long as a shadow as Jamila. Arthur and Billi are defined by her. Their relationship is mirrored by Arthur's feelings of failure and by the void Billi feels by not having known her mother.
"Today’s Copyright Tribunal ruling makes it clear that the UK’s copyright law is on a head-on collision with the average Internet user. Everyday acts such as searching for news and sharing it at work now require a license from the Newspaper Licensing Association (NLA). In a win for business, Meltwater Group and the PRCA (Public Relations Consultants Association) were able to convince the Copyright Tribunal to slash the NLA’s proposed license fees by 90 per cent. Sadly today’s verdict is only a partial victory for the UK Internet community. Going forward, it is clear that UK clients of online news monitoring services will need a license agreement with the NLA and pay copyright fees. This is also the case for commercial UK clients of any news monitoring vendor including Google News. During the proceedings, the NLA stated that it has been mandated by its owners and intends to pursue licensing of UK business users of Google News.
He gets down on his knee.
Chapter 16: Message Interaction Patterns
“So you don’t remember the tornado…the flying cow…the wicked witch or the munchkins?”
Did you know this?
Anyhoo, onto the Cask v. Real Ale argument (It's quite clear-cut, surely, Real Ale is "matured by secondary fermentation in the container from which it is dispensed". And normally sucked rather than blown out like "keg" would be)
KILLING JOKE - MMXII
Lyngstad
Do not learn how to delay-Skyrim map and a whole lot more.
100 ml semi-skimmed milk
Racism is one thing, being aggrieved about the state of your Country because of mass immigration from the 4 corners of the World and the burden on our inherited 'Welfare State' is completely different.
Cancer Weakness Keywords:
It was good and I am really excited to know I can feed all 5 of us the Chili's Cobb Salad for only $8.91.
Wait 90 days before calling him/her your girlfriend
percent pass rate in Zimbabwe School Examinations Council (Zimsec) Grade Seven examination results. The overall pass rate ranged between zero to nine percent pass rate.
One last thing – If you don’t already have our Sketch Challenge Blinkie posted on your blog, we would be honored if you would grab the blinkie HTML code that may be found on the sidebar and find a place for it in one of your sidebars. Displaying it on your blog helps us spread the Waltzingmouse Challenge word.
One guava-- try to get a ripe one. Slice into cubes. My grandmother won't scare you away :)
I was so completely aghast that I said, fine, I'm saying something since a few of them were still hanging out in the bar:
Pomegranate trees including subtropical tree species, which can survive low temperatures (below 10 degrees Celsius). The best fruit is produced in areas with cool winters and temperate regions are hot and dry. However, this fruit cannot grow in a humid location. This tree grows in almost any soil type including ground limestone. Therefore, very easy pomegranate trees were planted everywhere.
As we face this year and the years ahead, we have this confidence in the God who is the same yesterday, today and forever.
A stunning archive of the thousands of depositions from protestants who experienced the 1641 Catholic Rising in Ireland have gone online following three years of effort by the University of Aberdeen, Trinty College Dublin and the University of Cambridge.
So, I don't have any photos of the tart cut. I took the tart over to my friend's house where he had set up about three flashes and his fancy-pants camera. Many shots of the whole tart were taken before we cut a perfect slice out and took many most photos of the slice and the tart, etc. It was fun and a lot of the photos seemed to turn out pretty nicely. Of course I haven't seen any since that night, but as soon as I get my hands on them, I'll post them up and show you what my food looks like when you light it properly instead of just using the natural light of my huge apartment windows.
There's always some reason to feel not good enough
15. You have known all of this for quite some time, and it is because you have that we are applauding your patience in awaiting irrefutable evidence of what we have told you. The wait is almost over — drama in abundance is right around the corner!
04. Jack Of All Trades
My copy of this book is sixty years old. It was given to me as a leaving present by my teacher when I left my school in Lagos to go to Jesselton, North Borneo. I covered it back then in brown paper to preserve it and the paper has weathered the years very well.
Creative thought: This is where originality comes in. Most of the skills listed above deal with writing and reading other people's words. But grade schoolers have thoughts and feelings of their own, and it's good for them to express them, even if they're nothing more complex than, “I like pizza.” You know what? I do too.
His review was particularly scathing. He said we were terrible and that he didn’t understand how we expected to make any money with this. And our singer was “an absolute joke”.
I've worn it long for about the last ten years, so this was Substantial Change.
The National Union of Metalworkers of SA said the judgment was a victory for the working class.
not seven minutes in -- the collossal Cyclops,
“This is the first beer we have ever brewed that started with the packaging,” said Saint Arnold Founder/Brewer Brock Wagner. “The process started over four years ago. We originally commissioned Carlos to design new packaging for Saint Arnold Brown Ale. We loved what he came back to us with, but somehow it didn’t fit the Brown Ale. Thus began our work on creating a beer to fit the packaging, an odd process for us. The final result was a recipe we called a black Kölsch. We’ve been waiting to have the capacity available to brew it and are now very excited to begin drinking it.”
No, the other one.
Rehab professionals, strength coaches and researchers will continue to debate this topic. There are certainly contraindications to performing deep squats and it is always important to weigh the risks and rewards associated with any type of exercise.
This blog does not contain any content which might present a conflict of interest.
Regarding point #1, a few color experts such as Michael Wilcox and Bruce MacEvoy have been urging manufacturers to give more information on their labeling. Manufacturers, for the most part, have responded, and most reputable makers will show the pigment names and ASTM ratings.
For the last 3 months I've been exhausted & sick. Alternating between the two. As of just a few days ago, I finally have some energy back, and took the time to do a few things around the house.
Card stock: American Crafts
Next week our challenge begins on Sunday the 9th January, and ends with a funky frontyard party on the following Saturday. We aim to post a blog each day of the challenge to let you know how things go.Stay tuned to read all about our challenge week and an exciting funky frontyard farmers finale announcement.
The first time I made the dish for my step kids, I knew it needed a new name. I was dealing with children who knew what an enchilada was. When I tried to explain it, I told them it was a cross between a Sloppy Joe and a taco. So, lo and behold, Messy Tacos were born.
Young, broken women and men
Tennis – India did come to winning Davis cup a couple of times. India has been able to win Grand Slams only in the doubles event and an Olympic singles bronze medal.
“Audi has always consciously selected championships and categories in racing that have a close relationship to production and therefore have technical relevance for the Audi customers,” explains Head of Audi Motorsport Dr. Wolfgang Ullrich, who personally drove the new Audi R18 e-tron quattro onto the stage on Wednesday evening during its world premiere in the Audi Training Center at Munich airport – electrically and almost silent. “quattro, TFSI and TDI are three excellent examples of how motorsport has stimulated production development. A similar tendency is apparent with the e-tron quattro: we test a completely new technology on the race track before it’s introduced to the Audi production line.”
I instantly wanted to make a card for a little girl and my first thought was to use Wellies Robyn... I can't help it, I love her LOL!! But I had a few cards to make and made this one for a good friend's little boy who was 3 a couple of weeks ago. I hope he likes it (yes I haven't quite got around to posting his card... oops)
~Janelle
Neil Young - guitar, harmonica, vocals
The Mail & Guardian reported this week that the Inspector General of Intelligence, Advocate Faith Radebe, recommended on March 6 that Mdluli’s suspension be lifted, but not Lazarus’s.
take one piece of dough and flour it well all over. coax the dough, on a well floured board or counter, into a rough rectangle.
First, Jesus is full of compassion. He cares about our big problems, as well as issues of minor significance. He is profoundly committed to our restoration and, yes, our happiness. Jesus is not a kill-joy, but a joy-bringer. In this story, the leper in fact teaches us how to pursue the favor of God. We begin by imploring him. The idea of “implore” implies a committed effort to see something change. We should not expect God to do what he said he would do if we do not believe he will do it. The end result of a true imploring for the Christian is that if God heals it is because it is best for you; if God does not heal it is because it is best for you. The end-result is a win-win. The Bible says we are to come with boldness before the throne of grace. This is what it means to implore.
* There are some counter claims for this one, as the Wikipedia article I’ve linked to explains.
“I just returned from Lesotho and wanted to pass on a huge THANKS from the kids! We distributed the PJ’s to needy children in various villages which surround Mohale Clinic, located in the central highlands of Lesotho. Most of the kids who received PJ’s are either orphans, HIV-positive, or live with a family member who is infected. They truly appreciated the warm clothes to sleep in since it’s been a brutal winter this year.”
Laboratory studies of bottlenose dolphins have found various dimensions of their intellectual abilities. Bottlenose dolphins have declarative knowledge – they understand the symbolic representation of things; they have procedural knowledge – they understand how things work, and how to manipulate it; they have social knowledge – letting them understand the activities, identities and behavior of others; and they have self knowledge/self-awareness – they understand their own image, behavior and body parts. Self-awareness is one of the rarest capacities in the animal kingdom, but dolphins are even able to recognize themselves in a mirror.
How could anyone ever not love this song, oh how much more educational dumping drugs into my body and listening to punk was then listening to my sexually-depraved teachers were. I thank me. My agrandma was right, I was too smart for school.
Funny how I am referring to the pigeon as "he" when we have just named it Princess Pei Pei (after Lucy Liu's character in Shanghai Noon). Too pretty to be a boy ... don't you agree?
However, there is a smile on my face, and it’s the biggest smile that I've had in so very, very long.
It's amazing what a little sleep does for the soul. :)
the brown boots or the black.
This park has many different kinds of animals that the children can interact with. It states in the brochure that you can “Visit our barn filled with friendly domestic animals such as llamas, pigs and donkeys. You can even feed the goats.”
Their specialty is the herb rubbed samgyeopsal (KRW 10,000 for 160g) or 허브삼겹살 pronounced hub-sam-gyeop-sal, and it was fantastic! The meat was sliced to a nice thickness, so it still has some chew after it’s cooked. Most of the slices had the ideal 2 to 1, meat to fat ratio. And last but not least, the herb rub really enhanced the overall experience of the pork belly. It added a pleasant herbal scent and also helped to offset the greasiness of the samgyeopsal.
maybe because his hair is so much a part of who he is.
Freemasons, along with the targeted theft of vast masonic archives, many
But this man, after he had offered one sacrifice for sins for ever, sat down on the right hand of God; Hebrews 10:12 (KJV)
3. Baby Let Me Be*
But let me tell you something else about sick babies.
6. Regular reading of this blog will not cause blurred vision, vertigo, or itching. It may, however, bring on tingling in the extremities, profuse sweating, and slight heart palpitations brought on by giggling and swearing when you read some posts. At least, I certainly hope for a reaction.
Many of these challenges remain outside our direct control, lying either with physical constraints that are effectively absolute, or with levels of state authority we cannot easily manipulate.
Today I will be sharing my thoughts on the EOS Ice lenses in Brown kindly sponsored by MUKUCHU. I haven't seen many reviews on these yet so I'm assuming they're fairly new. I want to apologize in advance for my poor photo quality (you'll see what I mean!) I didn't notice until they were uploaded on my computer :/
Consumers are price sensitive and when they can buy a 20 pack of Stella at £10, it is hard to convince many to try a few bottle of Thornbridge for the same price. Deep supermarket discounts were a common theme among British craft and heritage brewers when describing the difficulty becoming established in the off-trade. Supermarkets were demanding such deep discounts (for them beer is a loss-leader generally) that the smaller brewers could not make any money. Only the big industrial brewers with their sizable economies of scale could still make money at these prices.
Little Mouth by Sleater-Kinney
The bedroom below from Love This Life is one of my favorites. I love the monochromatic look that is still interesting. The gorgeous paneled ceiling and floor to ceiling windows don't hurt either!
I cannot believe I've been in Chile for less than 24 hours and I'm already falling deeply in love with this country. I talked to so many smiling faces today in and around Santiago, my heart has melted a little bit. It is the people that really make a place isn't it? We only scratched the surface with a short trip to Mercado Central, lunch of avocado and heart of palm salad and a lovely candlelit dinner we ate as the sun went town, painting the Andes a shocking pink. I'm as giddy as a school girl! There are so many electric colors and textures here, and as I said before, a genuine friendliness.
And he looked up to me. I guess that's when he decided that I was his hero. I was the cool big brother he tried to emulate. He wanted to be just like me. He walked like me, talked like me, acted like me, wanted to do all the cool things I did.
I envy the newspaper,
Bake for about 45 minutes. Can be eaten hot or cold!
Preheat oven to 375°. In another small bowl mix all of your ingredients together with a fork or your fingers, until crumbly. Sprinkle over the tops of your muffins and put in preheated oven. Bake for 18-22 minutes or until the tops are golden brown and tester stick removes clean. Enjoy warm with a little butter or cold glass of milk!
Note the cutting just goes about an inch from the top.
For a limited time only I will critique your child's artwork or story they've made up. The cost will be $10.00 for three; yep, you heard it right...THREE pieces of artwork and/or stories. Two stories and one drawing of the outside of the house with your whole family standing outside? No problem. Three stories...even if written in crayon -- heck, I'll take them all on.
Measuring cup with a spout ($1 at Target)
About those images: One of the most fun parts of this year’s One Island One Book program, for me, has been spending time with our fabulous online archive of photographs. These are scanned, identified and uploaded by Monroe County Historian Tom Hambright and his team of dedicated volunteers. There are more than 11,000 images in the whole collection and 700 just related to the railroad. The slideshow above is a small sample of my favorites but I recommend checking this site out to anyone interested in Keys history. Another favorite from the same era I can’t resist revisiting: the waterfront passes that were required of workers in that area during World War I. The photographs are haunting and beautiful and the information provides a time capsule of Key West life in that era.
call a traditional telephone hotline like1-800-SUICIDE, IMAlive is
Place lard and salt in a large mixing bowl. Whip with an electric mixer on high speed until fluffy. Add masa harina and beat at low speed until well mixed. Pour in reserved cooking liquid a little at a time until mixture is the consistency of soft cookie dough.
- Spicy Girl roll (tempura shrimp & cucumber topped with spicy tuna & tempura)
“During the term of this Agreement, the Author shall not, without written permission of the Publisher, publish or permit to be published any material based upon or incorporating material from the Work or which would compete with its sale or impair the rights granted hereunder.”
When we doubt our self-worth, we are in a very difficult position in any relationship. Our need to be accepted and affirmed by our partner often causes us to deny our own feelings, needs, beliefs and values. We try to become who we believe the other wants us to be. We cannot bear for the other to be dissatisfied or angry with us. We are afraid we are at fault or that the other will leave us.
What I liked.
Okay, so there’s the Growler and its crew, and its four nuclear missiles, each capable of obliterating a New York city or a Chicago or a Los Angeles or a Moscow or a Saint Petersburg, and each having a range of 500 miles. Moscow is 9,049 air miles. Saint Petersburg about the same.
You can find more in my etsy shop. They are in limited supply and I won't be making anymore this season. I have to start working on some other things.
It’s a classic nightmare. Jamie’s record made him an easy target.
I find it kind of odd that I spend so much of my time in the basement, writing and whatnot. It just seems to be very boring. I suppose if I had the money and the ambition, I could take the vlogging and blogging along to some of those crazy things that go into the Wishful Thinking theme. But, I don’t know, this just seems a bit boring. Maybe I’m just not doing it the right way. Or, maybe, I should just make the most of what I’ve got, because there’s no point in not playing the cards you’re dealt. Play the game!
“Do not sorrow, for the joy of the LORD is your strength.”
And Angela Bishop and her latest in soft pastel, 'Soaking up the sun'. I LOVE the light in this. It just glows. You can find Angela's soft pastel work on bith Flickr and for sale on Etsy, and Angela, herself, on her blog, 'Beauty in Art'.
This is what happens to your self preservation when you have something interfering with your normal processes; stress or something from outside like drugs or alcohol. It can be devastating to the normal process of life in the worst cases. In the worst cases, thoughts of suicide can come through and in the very worst case, they can become more than thoughts.
Yours grinningly,
In each case, the information delivered to the patient (in both cases friends of mine) was entirely correct. The problem was not in the decision making, the outcome, the skill, accuracy or dedication of the professional discussing their case, but in the way it was discussed.
I am 'just' pregnant, about 8 weeks. I had an 'emergency' caesarean with my first child after going with midwife led care through at XX Hospital.
It is totally acceptable and reasonable to have dreams and for politicians to lead people with the promise of dreams and it is very successful, ask any member of the ANC, because it has always worked for them. It ensures a following and it provides financial support and builds esprit de corps within the group, but unfortunately it is also blinding.
So the chief priests and the Pharisees convened the Sanhedrin and said, “What are we going to do? This man is performing many signs. If we leave him alone, all will believe in him, and the Romans will come and take away both our land and our nation.” (John 11:45-48)
Mint leaves (chopped)
92) I have no idea what the hell I'm going to do with the rest of my life. I'm not doing anything with it now.
Rand Paul made this particular argument when he said the following, in explanation of his position on business rights and civil rights: "I think it’s a bad business decision to ever exclude anybody from your restaurant."
Solution: The previous management foolishly shut down profitable factories and branches. We need to reverse that by investing in new factories, new markets, and hire the necessary employees. We’ll print some money to cover the start-up costs, but are confident that the ROI will begin to be realized early, and will eventually be significant.
So, this weekend I'm in Bristol, staying with a friend, Lena. She's awesome, and we're getting along like an house on fire... and it's all good and we're talking politics and religion and sexuality and booty calls and 50's burlesque lingerie... it's so so SO fun.
A while back I decided to clean out my craft closet in my work room, mostly because it was bulging at it's hinges, and I promised myself I would get control of this! I tend to hang on to just about anything that seems useful or could be made into something. I have saved some goofy stuff over the years, all in the name of future craft projects.
I've got a quick update on the entryway for y'all later today if little buggie agrees to her nap today.
Being the frugal girl that I am...I managed to get two stickers onto each label....so that is 1050 stickers in total!!! The best thing is, they are custom made and so much cuter than anything I could find in the stores:)
Guess what? Because it was Easter, they were all closed!!!!!!!
We also discussed my relationship with my SO. She feels that this move makes us work together. Moving stuff, coordinating where to put items, how to pack stuff, unpack stuff, etc. makes us do things together. It makes us communicate. And that is part of why I’m happier too.
I've used the new Feb Kit.
I was then told to kneel between Master's knees, and let Him know if I had enjoyed my birthday spanking...since I had, I definately let Him know how much. I was then told to turn around , so He had access to my bottom, and Master soon had me begging for permissions...and a few were granted.
Wednesday - Chicken with feta, olives, and spinach w/black salsify and kale gratin
I witnessed the kill floor this past weekend, too. It’s humane, not horrible. The animals aren’t panicked, bruised, and broken when they are slaughtered. The White Oak Pasture abattoir was designed by one of the world’s foremost authorities on animal livestock behavior and humane slaughter, Temple Grandin.
We ran a few erronds and picked up Ron's new work pickup then came home and had a PARTY!
The Stones articles says, “The reality is, there are few repercussions for online harassment. The Communications Decency Act protects Internet publishers from being sued for content — allowing people to post virtually anything without fear of consequences. Finding some kind of balance between free speech and privacy online will almost certainly become one of the major legal battles of the century. For now, however, content providers like Stone are nearly untouchable.”
- Just sit back and accept the fact that we will soon be a minority in our own country.
i dont want to be pregnant anymore. i want to go home and paint and organize the nursery and put away their clothes and do what normal moms do. i want to be a mom to my son. a wife to my husband.
051292
3.Sift cake flour, rice flour and baking powder into a mixing bowl.
Fun show. Two food remotes and one remote of us making t-shirts. The vote is definitely for BLUE. Please email us your gender and size and we will send you a PAYPAL invoice for $15. Shipping Included! EMAIL :: thetacomaven@gmail.com
Like the sharp bouquet of kaffir lime leaves, and the biting heat of little chillies...
On to today’s epistle, which is one of two individual letters. Yesterday’s post discussed the role of women in the New Testament from Matthew Henry’s uplifting perspective. Henry concluded that, given the elevated position of women in Christ’s and the apostles’ ministries, it is no surprise that a woman
There's no penalty to drop!
Gearbox severity: Medium
“Nobody liked each other” Dell said explain the feelings of the armies fighting in the war. “The Germans hated everyone. The Russians hated the Germans and the Italians. No one liked the French except for the Italians. But everyone loved the Americans because they had chocolate and cigarettes.” And with that last statement Dell had to leave, he had to make sure he was avilable to all that wanted to know his story.
Sometimes it lasts in love but sometimes it hurts instead.
That's on it's way to Slough
Melted Chocolate Easter Bunny
05. A Little One
So far, most regional and national journalists seem to be blissfully ignorant of his real political views and the motivating ideologies which underpin Searchlight/Hope Not Hate. (The same goes for Weyman Bennett/Martin Smith and Unite Against Fascism.)
And speaking of insane comedy, weird science, and crazy plot twists, there simply is no better example than the first episode I watched – the Christmas special Do You See What I See. The episode is described in detail at the linked to site, but here’s a nice “recap” from the good folks at TV Fanatic:
That means that at least a million Americans who marched on Washington, now know that the American media misrepresent the truth. (Hey Buddy, wake up and smell the coffee, how do you think Barry got elected?) Saddly, many amongst that million already know that, as they have attended so called “Tea Parties” and Town Hall meetings to express their concerns about Obama's policies in recent months and then heard the TV news report an entirely different event to the one they attended. However, it remains a significant number.
u get wat u expect 2 get!so by giving u are
I've written up my blog post on the Farnham White Bine hop as an article* for the journal of the Brewery History Society. Sadly the pictures are of the usual low standard regular readers of this blog will have come to expect. So the editor asked hop expert Peter Darby if he could find something better, and as well as sourcing some pictures Peter was kind enough to invite me over to further my research using the Wye archives.
Anyway, the message went along the lines of...
Back in the day I was a bit of a girl gamer. A 'tiny' bit. Ok, quite a lot actually but it was the 80's and I was a teen and geeks were cool back then and Summer lasted 10 months of the year...ok, some of that was probably made up but the rest is true.
Dear Siley,
Although the US strategic deal with Afghanistan is just a part of the “Great Game” but President Karzai is not in a position to give a green signal to the US in this regard as yet.
is real.
But sometimes luck shines upon us. Even when we are unprepared. Stupid. Ignorant in our actions.
This week for our How I Write series, my accountability group asked, “What advice do you think your younger self would give to you now? What advice would you give to your older self/future self?”
I haven’t run La Jolla since high school (5 years). Being one of my favorite roads in San Diego I was excited to see what the legs could produce. Race morning was the business as usual. I spent the night at my parents place and awoke with my Dad (who was running) to down some coffee and chow down. We got dressed and it seemed that we would have perfect running weather. The day before it was in the high 80’s but today it was in the mid 60’s with overcast skies. I usually hate cloudy days with a passion but I was SSTOKED. We drove the few miles to Miltons, which is only a ½ mile from the start line at the Del Mar Race Track. After jogging over we lined up at the front so that we wouldn’t have to weave through the crowds.
This was made in 1994. It was an exploration of what it means to be a granddaughter, a daughter and a mother. Each object included in the work was carefully chosen for its symbolism. Including a seed for birth and amber for protection. The bone at the bottom of the piece is covered with the words from a poem “A wish for my Children” by Evangeline Paterson
I do plan on taking the time to realllly read the Lucy Calkin's Reading Workshop and Writing Workshop books. I've read a lot of the Reading one, but I really want to understand it for next year.
Rosemary here - I do love water and so I was almost overwhelmed with ideas and finally after lots of tries, settled on ATCs for this challenge. Three of them; one was inspired by sailors on whalers and schooners who were gone from their sweethearts for so long and spent their idle hours making love trinkets - two are inspired by Hawaii, a place I long to see and enjoy! ( apologize for the lousy photo of the third ATC!)
of criminality. The lowly beasts of this world have more honor than
Here’s why – you did not grow up learning your native language. You grew up living it. The language you were subjected to was not carefully prepared and handpicked for your particular “level” of understanding, you were bombarded 24/7 with language every single day from a trillion (yes, trillion) different sources.
...judging by the effect a truly beautiful church has on people, if the Church (whether Catholic, Church of England, or whatever) was really smart, they'd have a guy at the front entrance, holding a large sheaf of "nun-papers" (or "priest papers" if you are a boy) whereby, when you are caught up in the spirituality and beauty of the church you have just entered, you sign away your soul and all your earthly possession just because you are so emotionally overwhelmed by the beauty around you.
Their website has a newsletter feature to keep all us impossible ‘roiders up to date with their progress. It’s a place to celebrate victories and bite your lip through some tough moments, as they share their determined efforts prevent this unique art form from disappearing forever…
Gulden Draak or Golden Dragon may give oriental associations, but there is a Norwegian angle as well.
We can then start looking at creating the open storage units that will flog the cooker and extractor fan which will need to be purchased and we'll need to get in an electrician to install those.
And moveless fish in the water gleam
At this school, before the kids assemble in the main classroom for lessons, they have a gym period of about half an hour. They go into a padded room which has a large trampoline and various pieces of climbing and swinging equipment, and run around like small madmen. I applaud whoever came up with this idea, of letting them burn off a little energy before having to sit still.
'Aha! That explains it ...'
linked each product to it's page on my website so you can see them). You are only required to purchase the "Basic Kit" to participate. Anything above and beyond that is totally up to you. I personally recommend the "Better Kit".
dont move, be still they say
Along with a crystal clear trophy, the team got custom jackets, a congratulatory visit from Boeing CEO Jim McNerney and lunch catered by the chefs at Boeing’s executive lunchroom.
Tim: Do WHAT?
Even though the doctor said not to- it is possible that I am freaking out a little. I know we are lucky and that it is most likely not a big deal but "Your son has a tumor" are not really word I like hearing.
Just some quick fan art, since I’ve been pretty busy lately. WOO AVENGERS!
Both the trilogy and the movie adaptation of the first book in The Hunger Games by Suzanne Collins have become smash hits not just in the United States, but across the world. This series, which has captured the attention of both youth and adults, has been making waves for its symbolism and depiction of an incredibly dystopian future. The following resources will prove highly useful for anyone interested in learning more about this provocative series.
After 3:20 pm things get a little crazy (or should I say crazier?)!
As things were getting more sexytime in the bedroom, there was a brilliant flash of light. It was the kind that announces that a deity of some kind has just arrived and you better sit up, pay attention and write this down: There's some serious news about to be imparted from on high.
Now Canal+ has gone and made a series just for the Web, Kali, and it's free for the looking with new episodes every Monday and Thursday. The episodes are just six minutes long (plus you can pause and replay if you didn't catch the French) but there's plenty of action and a tense story line that involves amnesia, the Eurostar, hand to hand combat, video surveillance, and piracy of new technologies. And while this isn't the stuff of my everyday life, it's very evocative of Paris, right down to the annoying SNCF jingle being played in Gare du Nord. Will Kali remember who she is and what she's doing in Paris? Is she British or French? And just who are the good guys and the bad guys? Stay tuned.
2. You don’t care about the majority of Americans.
we're gonna need them soon I am afraid.
While my pair of crows seem to live and nest in my backyard — although I can’t find the nest — they seem to be alone. Other breeding pairs usually have young offspring and family members who help with the nest and the nestlings. But my pair, larger this year than last, seem to be on their own.
Okay, back to the point. Here’s what I got this week:
Hudson and I sat in rocking chairs and played checkers.
I hope to have more photo's soon
May 1st, 2012 marks the 236th birthday of the infamous Illuminati and the timeline surrounding and leading up to this date is filled with death and violence. It is also important to know that dates and numbers are extremely important to many of these people. The Occult calendar from April 19-May 1st – exactly 13 days, the number of regeneration and wonderfully significant – is to contain a blood sacrifice to the “beast”. April 19 is also believed to be a day requiring a Fire sacrifice, which is appropriate relating to the fire (sun) gods of Baal, Molech, Nimrod, Saturn, etc.
Happy birthday to my sweet little Boushka. Everything I imagined you'd be by three years old, you are--and so much more. You have the pretty hair like I imagined. The big, dark eyes. A petite stature. A super kind heart. And an understanding of how to use words to convey anything and everything. But you are so much sweeter than I could've imagined. You've got the sweetest little girl voice that I want to capture on video just so I can hear it for always. The way you look at me when you're excited is something I never could've dreamed up. The way you love your sisters so much is something I hoped for, but the sweet ways you show your love is something else. You are my tiny--I tell you this all the time. When I tuck you in at night, you always want me to "tuddle wif" you--and no matter what else I have to do or how tired I am, I always "tuddle" you. I can't get enough of you. Often times, you are my breath of fresh air when I need to relax. You calm me down and ground me--making me realize how deeply I can love and how happy I can feel. One of my six hearts belongs entirely to you, my precious girl. There is so much I want to share with you. To tell you. To teach you--and I hope I'm blessed with all the years it will take for me to do these things--- plus a whole lot more. Because I want to see you pass them on to my grandchildren--knowing that the love they feel from you was planted in your heart many moons ago. I love you, Boushka (thiiiiiisss much)!
Birgitte Nyborg Christensen What is it Kasper?
Then off we went, including the dogs, in the rental car to visit the Crazy Horse Memorial. I had done some research online that indicated the Crazy Horse Memorial was pet-friendly. Unfortunately, it wasn't as pet friendly as I had thought or hoped and it was too hot to leave the dogs in the car. Nor could we take them inside the Welcome Center or the Museum. So Lynda and I took turns staying with Sydney and Barley under a shade tree in the parking lot while the other person went inside for about 45 minutes. It was the best we could do under the circumstances, but I wish we could have toured the place together and taken a great deal more time to look at the exhibits.
1. One Man Band
Can’t help but wonder what might have happened if Jesus had been the one freed. It’s very hard not to feel for someone in that plight.
After making sure the parasailing equipment is in good condition the ground assistants take position at each side of the parasail to hold it open. When things are ready, the parasailing assistants signal the boat driver to accellerate slowly until the tow line is pulled tout. My son then took a few quick strides and are pulled aloft. In seconds he liftoff, rose up in the air. Watching him rising uphill far away in the sky took my breath away, though I was not nervous, but was astonished and proud of my son’s being brave. He likes to play with challenging activities since he was a young child.
Hopefully there are enough people who will read between the lines so when the voting happens, the result is not something attributable to the Gods.
1808 Outbreak of the Peninsular War: The people of Madrid rose up in rebellion against French occupation. Francisco de Goya later memorializes this event in his painting The Second of May 1808.
Sometimes, we need the brutal honesty of such words. It doesn’t mean there isn’t good advice out there or points to consider. Rather, it means that conforming to the norms is not something that I should do.
And I am weeping warm honey and milk
calls him anymore.
03 Monkey Talk
The second promotional effort is a guest blog entry on the popular Travelocity blog, Window Seat. To check out my musings, click here.
*adhering glitter evenly without making a mess on your project.
Speaking of here, I very nearly didn't make it because of the weather yesterday. But I was lucky enough (seriously, how long has it been since I've gotten to say those words!) to finagle a flight change out of Seattle when my original itinerary through Dallas was canceled -- as well as the second and third rebookings automatically generated by the airline's computer system. No. 2 routed me through Chicago (into even heavier snow?); No. 3 put me back through DFW on the red-eye (16 hours after my original flight, into sub-zero conditions in a metropolis that handles temperatures in the 20s only rarely). Damned connecting cities!
On January 30, 2012 The Hershey Company announced its plan to reinforce cocoa sustainability efforts by accelerating farmer and family development in West Africa, where 70% of the world’s cocoa is grown. This objective will be achieved through various programs including these four highlights:
properties to his personal use.
(28 Weeks Later, just to save you scrolling up)
I worked on my plan for months. All through chemo and surgery. All through the arduous recovery periods. And through all the time when we didn't know what the outcome of it all was going to be. In fact, I made two plans. Plan A for a successful outcome, and Plan B for continued cancer. There were times, funnily enough more often after I knew it was over, when I looked upon Plan A with a certain amount of dread. I know myself only too well and I know what the obstacles are that I now am obliged by being alive to overcome. Still, those obstacles were there all along, and there is not now anything more to do than there was before cancer. It's just that now, I feel much more keenly that I want to try.
Cardinal Fleury, and by Pope Clement XII, in what was to be the first of
‘It’s the dead banana, not the sonic banana which would have reversed the polarity of the event horizon and – bleuurrrgh.’ The Doctor pulled a face with a protruding Haka tongue.
Below are the steps to complete your purchase.
So please hear these simple truths
One of the areas in which I long for perfection is the organization and planning of my upcoming wedding. I desire all of the details to be ordered in such a way that it will enable my new husband and I to share a delightful, memorable, and altogether perfect day. However, I am learning that no matter how ardently I try to control my circumstances so that they fit my liking, my circumstances end up controlling me!
Overall the resort was lovely, very clean, and service was pretty good, except for the one day the housekeeping guy came quite late to say that he couldn’t do a turn down service because all the rooms he was cleaning up all had kids. Not really my problem, pal. It’s a pity I was so disappointed with the marine life around the resort, and I think I might not go back or recommend the resort based on this alone. I mean, you go to Maldives you want to see lots and lots of fish, corals, turtles, sharks, etc. right? Other resorts are just teeming with marine life, but not this resort, although we did see one pretty large ray, the rest of the fish were boring old silver looking ones, and really not many at all. At some resorts the jetties alone are just bursting with marine life.
The Ministry of External Affairs had told Kaur in August 2005 that the BSF had taken up the matter with the Pakistan Rangers in October 2004. But nothing worked out.
The tent would be where those runners braving the miles of Seattle hills on behalf of a child with juvenile myositis would meet up with that child, family and friends after their journey.
I've left London off this one and as you can see, the only two regions where net wages buck the trend and are 'above the line' are the East Midlands and East (presumably because the landscape is a bit dull) and the South West is 'below the line' (because it has the nicest landscape and weather):
I really can't imagine a better, more complete list, can you?
There's no telling NIMBYs though and to make matters worse, not everyone associated with road sense even has an AB postcode. They've probably just dragged in vocal environmentalists from other parts of the country to help them out.
I know this is going to seem silly to some of you, but Holly covets my blanket. I have a soft fleece lined blanket I cover up with at night. Somehow Holly manages to be near me each night trying to lay on the blanket as it cascades over my feet. If I get up, she pulls it off the sofa onto the floor to snuggle into its softness. Sometimes, in an effort to get her whole body onto the blanket, all seventy pounds of her is curled into a ball on my feet.
Our barrel aged research has just begun, but see the stack of barrels behind Andy? That kind of space is already on this head brewers plan for the new place...
* Aaron and Grant in their matching "wife-beater" tank t-shirts. I am not sure how I feel about Grant walking around actually referring to his shirt as a wife-beater, but he looked pretty cute.
Yesterday was an ideal day for me. I spent about 11 hours painting. I rarely have this kind of opportunities. This painting is quite a challenge to me. All the objects I have not painted before, and the forms demand high degree of accuracy and need to be perspectively correct. Oh boy! Painting apples and flowers are much easier. But I really enjoyed the process. I paint it significantly slower than my demos, did a lot of cleaning, and used knifes for straight edges. I was very tired in the evening, but my day was well spent.
When's your due date?
In each, contained a small piece of his heart
Applied to something that came out of me)
Samuel, I have learned so much from you and your life. I have learned to trust God in deeper and more real ways. I have learned a truer humility and gentleness. I appreciate compassion and kindness deeply. I understand genuine joy and how different it is from happiness. I have experienced God's grace in new and mighty ways, and I have learned to love more completely. You have taught me these things.
Amanda Lepore is an American model, nightlife and fashion icon, performance artist, recording artist and transgender public figure. She has appeared in advertising for numerous companies, including M.A.C. Cosmetics, Mego Jeans, The Blonds, Swatch, CAMP Cosmetics, and Heatherette, which has used her likeness on clothing as well as hiring her as a model. Lepore is also noted as a regular subject in photographer David LaChapelle’s work, serving as his muse, as well as many other photographers including Marco Ovando and Terry Richardson. She participated in his Artists and Prostitutes 1985-2005 exhibit in New York, where she “lived” in a voyeuristic life-sized set. Amanda Lepore has also released several singles, many written by and/or recorded with Cazwell. In 2011 she released her full-length debut album “I…Amanda Lepore” on Peace Bisquit.
Thank you also for giving the answer to my problem. You have to tat both rings at the same time....not easy....going backwards and forwards to each ring to tat a bit more and get the joins interwoven thro' each ring.
Australian sapphires are very beautiful and amazing. The market is full of Australian sapphires because of their quality. The mines of Australia have produced large, high quality yellow sapphires. It also produces pink and orange sapphires. The best quality sapphires are mined in central Queensland, Australia.
Thank you for reading,
I've always run Bloomsday by myself but convinced Laura to do it with me this year since she's been running more lately. We had a sisters Bloomsday! (Well, until we parted ways at mile 4 as our running styles are just too different. We decided after the race that parting ways actually made us run better).
Mr James managed to combine all of my favorite things (crumbling palaces, crazy spinsters, subtle mystery, Venice) into a gorgeous novella that I couldn't put down. Our narrator is in search of the supposed letters or papers of Jeffrey Aspern, a Romantic poet (based on Percy Bysshe Shelley) who left them with his muse, a now ancient Juliana Bordereau. Miss Bordereau is an American that lives with her neice, Miss Tita, shut away from the world in a massive palazzo in Venice. Our narrator, somewhat whimsically ("My tastes and habits are the simplest; I live on flowers!") asks the ladies to let some rooms in order to write and work in their abandoned garden, of course not telling them he's in search of the papers kept in the clutch of Miss Bordereau's talons. They accept with a high price and he discovers little by little about the two (a 19th century Bouvier Beales) and the city in which they lived and live.
for a few weeks before.
Adhesive: Beacon Adhesive ZipDry
I dedicate this post to Mr.4444, who burned his fingers repeatedly during the grilling of these fine brats, due to having to spin the skewers and flip individual brat pieces that didn't cooperate. What a guy--I love that man.
Also, the changes to our physiological make-up are currently speeding up and there are many temporary physical symptoms that are occurring in our bodies as a consequence of this. Some of these are:
“Most of my life. Before that we lived out in the forest, not too far from the city.”
Everything that happens in the book that makes it so good is shown in the movie. But, it feels like the movie skips from major moment to major moment. The movie tries to encompass everything that makes The Hunger Games a great read, but it still felt like something was missing.
1. What are your favorite boy and girl names?
Make dressing by combining yolks, lemon juice, anchovies, garlic & mustard.
Drug Distribution and Exercise
Graham: after the debates the Newt will rise again
A recent U.S. survey suggests most people support the notion of building a better baby when it comes to eliminating serious diseases and genetic testing of embryos is nothing new: For some time, fertility doctors have been able to examine days-old embryos created in laboratories by removing a single cell and scanning it for known DNA abnormalities. The technology is called pre-implantation genetic diagnosis or PGD. It was created to screen for disease, then later used for gender selection. But so far, fertility experts have used the technique almost exclusively to screen for serious medical conditions caused by well-identified genetic mutations.
Four tobacco companies including British American Tobacco (BAT), Philip Morris, Imperial Tobacc-
Seriously? Because if they are my friends, really my friends, they know how to get in touch with me. I'm just saying.
I've yet to be disappointed in a beer from Flossmoor Station. This beer runs a bit higher on the IPA meter than most. It has a huge heaping of citrus flavor, but also has the bitterness to match, and many people just don't like that, but if you are a hop-head at all this beer is worth getting your hands on. Another great beer from the duo up in Flossmoor.
This technique is perfect for adding inked images that you may not have a stamp for - but it does work best with mostly solid, silhouette type cuts.
Barton thinks as so many that might is right and money is evidence of God’s grace. I was disappointed to read that James Dobson of Focus on the Family said that God favors America because he gave it the greatest military in the world.
The passivity of that sentence belies how much space I put between myself and my successes--"when things are going my way."
You can read “The Woman’s Handbook from beginning to end or randomly open this book for a quick boost when you need inspiration.
One could not be a Decadent poet of the 1890s without having an acquaintance with "spleen." In this case, "spleen" derives from the ancient "four humors" theory of the body. This theory posits that our maladies, as well as our temperaments, may be traced back to the four humors: blood, yellow bile, black bile, and phlegm. Black bile is usually associated with the spleen, and, in turn, with melancholia. Suffering a bout of "spleen" was quite attractive to the Decadents.
+++ UPDATE : 21:50 +++
At NAB MComms is launching a new cloud based service that constantly checks your video streams, see us for a free trial.
I have an answer. Not a joke, not a lie, not a pointless video or a sarcastic comment, but a real, implementable, policy answer that, if implemented, would be guaranteed to raise employment significantly and almost immediately. So please--come back tomorrow and bring your Representative or Senator as we reveal the official, honest-to-goodness, zero-cost "My Life and Hard Times" Economic Stimulus Plan.
Love was farce and loneliness was truth,
I had a hard time choosing between her and Jennifer Rofé among all the wonderful Andrea Brown agents representing MG. That makes it easier for me now, I can query both! Good timing, I haven't sent my queries yet.
My best buy were the Toulouse sausages, made from free range pigs who had led stress-free, happy lives and been well fed. The meat was mixed with a little all-spice and coriander, and they made a yummy Sunday dinner. At just £2.95 for five I’d be tempted to eat them for dinner every Sunday night…
Level 21: MP Cost: 44, Duration: 186 seconds, Damage: +42%, Critical Rate: +17%, Minimum Critical Damage: +11%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
And they asked me in to dinner, to get the beauty of it hot -
Because, my beautiful dame, you have witnessed the exodus of some of your more doting sons and daughters. Never has a song sounded more truthfully than when it claims that 'if my eyes ever deserted you/if life banished me to another place on this Earth/I swear to you that I'll die of love and angst wanting to walk your streets, your parks and places.'
Overnight leader Westwood had parred his first 10 holes and produced two birdies on the back nine but undid a lot of his work on the final hole where he three-putted for a double bogey.
Fast-forward a few years, as I was entering my teens, and feeling more shy and introverted than ever. The few friends I had through home learning activities were going into high school, and I felt more lonely than ever.
9 oz carton frozen whipped topping, thawed
“Banks lend by creating credit. They create the means of payment out of nothing.” – Ralph M. Hawtrey, former Secretary of Treasury, England.
Keep in mind that you can submit as many entries as you like, but they cannot be multiple parts covering one story. Each video must have a separate topic.
The only restriction is that you only enter 3 times in total, all other entries after that will be deleted and the earlier ones may be forfeited.
